From - Thu Dec 10 14:22:51 2009
X-Mozilla-Status: 0001
X-Mozilla-Status2: 00000000
X-Gmail-Received: 18c67b338fc6980841a58af467543ab4e5e30b01
Delivered-To: jpprost@gmail.com
Received: by 10.65.228.3 with SMTP id f3cs45753qbr;
        Sat, 22 Apr 2006 21:09:09 -0700 (PDT)
Received: by 10.35.121.2 with SMTP id y2mr2326803pym;
        Sat, 22 Apr 2006 21:08:59 -0700 (PDT)
Return-Path: <owner-LINGUIST@listserv.linguistlist.org>
Received: from listserv.linguistlist.org (listserv.linguistlist.org [164.76.102.107])
        by mx.gmail.com with ESMTP id m68si63708pye.2006.04.22.21.08.56;
        Sat, 22 Apr 2006 21:08:59 -0700 (PDT)
Received-SPF: pass (gmail.com: domain of owner-LINGUIST@listserv.linguistlist.org designates 164.76.102.107 as permitted sender)
Received: from listserv (listserv [164.76.102.107])
	by listserv.linguistlist.org (8.13.6/8.13.6) with ESMTP id k3N3m609007575;
	Sun, 23 Apr 2006 00:00:11 -0400 (EDT)
Date:     Sun, 23 Apr 2006 00:00:10 -0400
Reply-To: The LINGUIST Discussion List <LINGUIST@LISTSERV.LINGUISTLIST.ORG>
Sender: The LINGUIST Discussion List <LINGUIST@LISTSERV.LINGUISTLIST.ORG>
From: LINGUIST automatic digest system <LISTSERV@LISTSERV.LINGUISTLIST.ORG>
Subject: LINGUIST Digest - 21 Apr 2006 to 22 Apr 2006 (#2006-103)
To: LINGUIST@LISTSERV.LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Message-ID: <LINGUIST%200604230000106959.6FCA@LISTSERV.LINGUISTLIST.ORG>
Precedence: list
X-Greylist: Sender IP whitelisted, not delayed by milter-greylist-2.0.2 (listserv.linguistlist.org [164.76.102.107]); Sun, 23 Apr 2006 00:00:12 -0400 (EDT)

There are 14 messages totalling 3159 lines in this issue.

Topics of the day:

  1. 17.1211, Review: Applied Ling/ESL: Llurda (2005)
  2. 17.1212, Review: Dictionaries/Dialectology: Laugesen (2005)
  3. 17.1213, Review: Applied Ling: Bruthiaux et al. (2005)
  4. 17.1214, Review: Software/Morphology: Alchemist 2.0 (1st review)
  5. 17.1215, Jobs: Spanish/Phonetics/Phonology: Prof/Lecturer, MI
  6. 17.1216, Jobs: Arabic/Applied Linguistics: Lecturer, Georgetown U
  7. 17.1217, Books: Morphology: Booij, Van Marle (Eds)
  8. 17.1218, Books: Applied Linguistics/Language Acquisition: Caldas
  9. 17.1219, Books: Sociolinguistics: Dornyei, Csizer, Nemeth (Eds)
 10. 17.1220, Calls: Phonology/Greece;Applied Ling/Netherlands
 11. 17.1221, Calls: General Ling/Ireland;Socioling/Canada
 12. 17.1222, Calls: Athapaskan Ling/Northwest Territory, Canada
 13. 17.1223, Confs: General Ling/Amsterdam, Netherlands
 14. 17.1224, Confs: General Ling/Oslo, Norway

----------------------------------------------------------------------

Date:    Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:30:52 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1211, Review: Applied Ling/ESL: Llurda (2005)

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1211. Fri Apr 21 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1211, Review: Applied Ling/ESL: Llurda (2005)

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Lindsay Butler <lindsay@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

This LINGUIST List issue is a review of a book published by one of our
supporting publishers, commissioned by our book review editorial staff. We
welcome discussion of this book review on the list, and particularly invite
the author(s) or editor(s) of this book to join in. To start a discussion of
this book, you can use the Discussion form on the LINGUIST List website. For
the subject of the discussion, specify "Book Review" and the issue number of
this review. If you are interested in reviewing a book for LINGUIST, look for
the most recent posting with the subject "Reviews: AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW", and
follow the instructions at the top of the message. You can also contact the
book review staff directly.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 17-Apr-2006
From: Burcu Ates < burcuates@tamu.edu >
Subject: Non-Native Language Teachers 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:27:33
From: Burcu Ates < burcuates@tamu.edu >
Subject: Non-Native Language Teachers 
 

Announced at http://linguistlist.org/issues/16/16-2804.html 

EDITOR: Llurda, Enric
TITLE: Non-Native Language Teachers
SUBTITLE: Perceptions, Challenges and Contributions to the 
Profession
SERIES: Educational Linguistics 5
PUBLISHER: Springer
YEAR: 2005

Burcu Ates, doctoral student, Department of Teaching, Learning, & 
Culture, Texas A&M University at College Station

Non-Native Language Teachers: Perceptions, Challenges and 
Contributions to the Profession is the most recent book that focuses 
on non-native language teachers. Previous volumes include books 
such as ''Non-Native Educators in English Language Teaching'' 
(Braine, 1999), and ''Learning and Teaching from Experience: 
Perspectives on Nonnative English-Speaking Professionals'' (Kamhi-
Stein, 2004). 

The editor has collected 15 articles which are all written by prominent 
scholars who are involved in non-native speaker (NNS) of 
English/Native speaker (NS) of English research. As stated in the back 
of the book ''This volume is particularly rich in providing different 
approaches to the study of non-native teachers: NNS teachers as 
seen by students, teachers, graduate supervisors, and by themselves. 
It also contributes little explored perspectives, like classroom 
discourse analysis, or a social-psychological framework to discuss 
conceptions of NNS teachers.'' The book adds a valuable contribution 
to the growing literature on non-native English speaking teachers 
(NNESTs).

The book is organized in five parts. Part 1: Setting up the Stage: Non-
native teachers in the twenty-first century, Part 2: NNS teachers in the 
classroom, Part 3: Perspectives on NNS teaching-in training, Part 4: 
Students' perceptions of NNS teachers, and Part 5: NNS teachers' self 
perceptions. 

One of the biggest strengths of this book is that previously in other 
volumes, the NNS research was mainly conducted in a North 
American (ESL-English as a Second Language) setting. However, in 
this book, a more international perspective (in EFL-English as a 
Foreign Language contexts) is studied, with examples from Sweden, 
Spain, Hong Kong, Hungary, Basque County, Israel, and Brazil. In the 
following, references to the countries covered will be made before 
explaining each chapter. 

SUMMARY

In chapter 1, the editor of the book, Enric Llurda, provides an overview 
of the topics covered in the book and of the contributing authors. He 
specifically emphasizes that although non-native researchers are the 
ones who are greatly involved with NNS issues, there are many native 
speakers who are involved in the study of NNS issues as well. The 
native-speaker authors in this volume are an example of this. 

In chapter 2, Braine sets the historical background of the non-native 
English speaking professionals' movement and the establishment of 
the Non-native English Speaker's Caucus in the TESOL organization 
in 1999 (http://nnest.moussu.net). Braine then examines the recent 
studies on NNS English teachers. Objectives, methodologies, and 
findings of the following studies are described: Reves & Medges 
(1994), Samimy & Brutt-Griffler (1999), Inbar-Lourie (2001), Llurda & 
Huguet (2003), Moussou (2002), Liang (2002), Cheung (2002), and 
Mahboob (2003). Five out of eight studies discussed are either 
unpublished master's theses or doctoral dissertations. These studies 
focus on self-perceptions of NNS teachers and/or students' 
perceptions of NNS English teachers.

SWEDEN: In Chapter 3, Modiano talks about how different ELT 
(English Language Teaching) programs and practices can help 
people throughout the world to learn the English language as a lingua 
franca. Then, Modiano provides the example of the country of 
Sweden and how for so long it was under the influence and 
domination of the British, where the educational materials portrayed 
the British lifestyle. Modiano suggests a cultural studies platform which 
promotes the development of non-native speaker identities rather than 
the development of the native speaker supremacy. 

In chapter 4, Cook discusses the L2 (second language) user concept 
and the multicompetence view of second language acquisition, 
treating the mind of the L2 user as a whole rather than as having a 
separate L1 (first language) and interlanguage components (meaning 
having two languages present in the same mind). The important 
argument throughout the chapter is to make students successful L2 
users rather than the 'desired' native speakers. 

In chapter 5, Macaro talks about codeswitching and argues that a 
teacher's codeswitching in class is not as negative as it seems. 
Macaro states it is the dominant culture's idea that codeswitching is a 
bad practice in the ELT classroom. He also explains how L2 users can 
benefit from their bilingual teachers' codeswitching in language 
classrooms. 

CATALONIA (SPAIN): In chapter 6, Cots & Diaz focus on NNS EFL 
teachers' talk in the construction of social relationships and linguistic 
knowledge in the classroom. The participants in the study were EFL 
teachers (6 different teachers with different genders and different 
teaching levels) in Catalonia. One of the findings was that teacher talk 
moves between a discourse of power and a discourse of solidarity. 
The linguistic knowledge was distinguished between categorical and 
non-categorical knowledge and explained in details. 

HONG-KONG: In chapter 7, McNeill focuses on NS and NNS teachers' 
sensitivity to language difficulty from a learner's perspective. In order 
to test this, McNeill included four groups (1 group expert NNS, 1 
novice NNS teachers, 1 expert NS, and 1 novice NS teachers) of 
English teachers and 200 Cantonese-speaking secondary school 
students in Hong Kong in his study.  The teachers were asked to 
make predictions about difficult vocabulary in a reading text and 
explain their decisions. The students were tested on the 
understanding of the lexical content. Then, the teachers' guesses 
were compared with students' answers. The study revealed that NNS 
teachers, as a group, were more successful in making predictions 
about students and their vocabulary difficulties in reading text for 
various reasons. 

U.S.A & CANADA: In chapter 8, Llurda looked into the issues of 
TESOL practicum supervisors (in North America) and their 
experiences in observing the skills and performances of both NNS and 
NS student teachers during the practicum process. The supervisors 
from different universities were surveyed was asked both closed and 
open-ended questions. 

U.S.A.: In chapter 9, Lui did a study about NNS of English Chinese 
graduate teaching assistants (CGTAs) teaching freshman composition 
to NS in the U.S. The teaching experiences of the CGTAs and their 
students' attitudes and teacher evaluations are provided. Challenges 
and celebrations of being a CGTA are also provided by different 
narrative examples. 

CANADA: In chapter 10, Derwing & Munro examined the adult ESL 
teacher training programs in two Canadian Cities: Vancouver and 
Edmonton. The chapter also provided some information about the 
practicum requirements in different TESOL programs in these cities. 
When ESL students were asked about NS and NNS teachers they 
explained strengths and weaknesses of both groups. 

HUNGARY: In chapter 11, Benke & Medgyes did a study in Hungary 
where 422 NNS English language learners (intermediate level of 
English proficiency) who were secondary school, college/university, or 
private language school students, filled out a survey about their 
perceptions of the differences between NS and NNS teachers. 
Advantages and disadvantages were found for both teachers such as; 
NNS would often give a lot of homework, plan lessons thoroughly and 
consistently check for errors.  They were also found to be good at 
teaching grammar. On the other hand, NS teachers would focus on 
speaking skills and would provide extensive information about their 
own culture. 

BASQUE COUNTRY: In chapter 12, Lasagabaster & Sierra's study 
wanted to examine if students preferred NS over to NNS as teachers 
in general, or vice versa. Also examined were what skills of NS or NNS 
teachers they preferred and if the preference changed according to 
the age/grade level of the learners (common notion: the earlier the 
better (primary education), therefore NS exposure at that level will be 
helpful). Seventy six university students in different Philology or 
Language Education programs participated in the study. 60.6% 
preferred the NS teacher; however 71.6% preferred to have both NS 
and NNS teachers. One interesting result was participants' preferred 
NS teacher at the university level not the primary education level.

ENGLAND: In Chapter 13, Pacek did a study at a British university 
with two different groups of students; one group enrolled in free 
vocabulary classes on campus (open to everyone) and the other 
group enrolled in a program specifically for Japanese secondary 
school teachers of English funded by the Japanese Ministry of 
Education for 11 months. The focus was to compare students' 
comments on most/least important characteristics of the foreign 
language teacher (first questionnaire) and students' initial reactions of 
having a NNS teacher. Each group was taught by the same NNS 
instructor. The results of the study differed for each group. Cultural 
and educational background played an important role in their 
perceptions; for example, the Japanese teachers had better insights 
compared to the other group when reflecting on having a NNS teacher.

ISRAEL: In Chapter 14, Inbar-Lourie examines the identity of the NNS 
teacher, both perceived and self-identified in the context of Israel. In 
order to investigate this she surveyed 102 EFL teachers in the Israeli 
school system. The EFL teachers were from 17 different countries; 
some were NS of English and some NNS. A self reported 
questionnaire was given to the EFL teachers about how they 
perceived themselves and how others perceived them. Their students 
were also asked how they perceived their NS/NNS teachers. 
According to the results of the study, a gap was found between self 
and perceived identity of EFL teachers. NNS teachers were perceived 
as NS by NNS and their students. On the other hand, NS were 
perceived as NS. 

BRAZIL: In Chapter 15, Rajagopalan takes a critical pedagogy stand 
and talks about how NNSTs became marginalized. He then talks 
about the action plan that leads to empowerment of NNS. A change 
will not happen overnight, but it will happen. He discusses some of the 
challenges specifically experienced by EFL NNS teachers that ESL 
NNS teachers do not experience. He also shares the project he is 
involved with in Brazil to empower a group of EFL teachers to 
overcome the lack of self-confidence they may have which is quite 
common among EFL NNS teachers.

CRITICAL EVALUATION

As can be read above, this book covers a great variety of topics 
related to the NS/NNS teacher's issues from different places around 
the world. The editor and the contributors of the book have done an 
excellent job presenting the topic. Although people interested in either 
ESL/EFL education or NS/NNS teachers may use the book, the topics 
studied are common and appealing to all language learners in 
general. The book shares not only examples of the challenges NNS 
teachers face, but celebrations too. In EFL settings evidence is 
provided by students' input; often NS teachers are preferred over 
NNS teachers, however there are examples of how NNS teachers can 
be helpful to language learners in a way NS cannot (see chapter 7 for 
details). The authors also show evidence for 'linguistic imperialism' 
(see chapter 3 for details: through educational materials, media, 
computers; the use of world literature translated into English over the 
Anglo vision promoted traditional English and American literature is 
suggested). Even in codeswitching scenario, codeswitching has 
always been portrayed as a negative behavior in EFL classroom 
settings (see chapter 5 for details) due to trying to establish native 
speaker dominance in every way. All the authors in the book take a 
critical position in discussing the native speaker supremacy and then 
directly or indirectly provide a message to take an 
against 'Monopolized English' domination by 'World English'.

REFERENCES

Braine, G. (Ed.). (1999). Non-native educators in English language 
teaching. Mahwah, NJ: Lawrence Erlbaum.

Cheung, Y.L. (2002). The attitude of  university students in Hong 
Kong towards native and non-native teachers of English. Unpublished 
M. Phil. thesis. The Chinese University of Hong Kong, Hong Kong. 

Inbar-Lourie, O. (1999). The native speaker construct: Investigation by 
perceptions. Unpublished doctoral dissertation. Tel-Aviv University, 
Tel Aviv, Israel.

Kamhi-Stein, L. D. (Ed.) (2004). Learning and teaching from 
experience: perspectives on nonnative English-speaking 
professionals. Ann Arbor, MI: University of Michigan Press.

Liang, K. Y. (2002). English as a second language (ESL) students' 
attitudes toward non-native English-speaking teachers' accentedness. 
Unpublished master's thesis. California State University, Los Angeles, 
CA.

Llurda, E. & A. Huguet (2003) Self-awareness in NNS EFL primary 
and se condary school teachers. Language Awareness, 12, 220-235.

Mahboob, A. (2003). Status of non-native English speaking teachers 
in the United States. Unpublished doctoral dissertation, Indiana 
University, Bloomington, IN.

Moussu, L. (2002). English as a second language students' reactions 
to non-native English-speaking teachers. Unpublished master's thesis. 
Brigham Young University at Provo, UT. 

Reves, T., & Medgyes, P.  (1994). The non-native English speaking 
ESL/EFL teacher's self-image:  An international survey. System, 22(3), 
353-367.

Samimy, K., & Brutt-Griffler, J. (1999). To be a native or non-native 
speaker: Perceptions of 'non-native' students in graduate TESOL 
program. In G. Braine (Ed.), Non-native educators in English 
language teaching. Mahwah, NJ: Lawrence Erlbaum. 127-144. 

ABOUT THE REVIEWER


Burcu Ates is a doctoral student at the Department of Teaching, 
Learning, & Culture (specializing in ESL Education), Texas A&M 
University, College Station. She teaches ESL methodology and 
assessment courses to preservice teachers as a Teaching Assistant. 
Her current research focuses on NS/NNS issues. She is especially 
interested in empowerment of NNS teacher educators.





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1211	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:37:13 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1212, Review: Dictionaries/Dialectology: Laugesen (2005)

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1212. Fri Apr 21 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1212, Review: Dictionaries/Dialectology: Laugesen (2005)

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Lindsay Butler <lindsay@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

This LINGUIST List issue is a review of a book published by one of our
supporting publishers, commissioned by our book review editorial staff. We
welcome discussion of this book review on the list, and particularly invite
the author(s) or editor(s) of this book to join in. To start a discussion of
this book, you can use the Discussion form on the LINGUIST List website. For
the subject of the discussion, specify "Book Review" and the issue number of
this review. If you are interested in reviewing a book for LINGUIST, look for
the most recent posting with the subject "Reviews: AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW", and
follow the instructions at the top of the message. You can also contact the
book review staff directly.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 16-Apr-2006
From: Clemens Fritz < clemens.fritz@clemens-fritz.de >
Subject: Diggerspeak: The Language of Australians at War 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:35:07
From: Clemens Fritz < clemens.fritz@clemens-fritz.de >
Subject: Diggerspeak: The Language of Australians at War 
 

Announced at http://linguistlist.org/issues/16/16-2387.html 

AUTHOR: Laugesen, Amanda
TITLE: Diggerspeak
SUBTITLE: The Language of Australians at War
PUBLISHER: Oxford University Press
YEAR: 2005

Clemens Fritz, Freie Universität Berlin

SUMMARY

'Diggerspeak' is a glossary of Australian military jargon covering a 
span of almost a century. Care was taken to filter out genuine 
Australian words and usages, leaving a comparatively small, but also 
well-researched and carefully documented set of some 400 lexical 
items. The glossary is ordered alphabetically and allows for easy 
reference. 

BACKGROUND 

The book is one of a number of recent publications emerging from the 
Australian National Dictionary Research Centre (ANDRC). Some of 
these cover regional vocabulary, e.g. Brooks and Ritchie (1994, 
Western Australia) and Robinson (2001, Queensland), others 
historical periods, e.g. Laugesen (2002, Convict Words) and Moore 
(2000, The Language of Nineteenth Century Australian Goldrushes). 
The ANDRC at the Australian National University, Canberra, was 
founded in order to conduct research into Australian English (AusE) 
and to provide Oxford Australian dictionaries with lexicographical 
expertise; both purposes have been expertly served as most of its 
publications have shown.

There are a number of related works 'Diggerspeak' can and should be 
evaluated against. For example, there are Arthur and Ramson (1990, 
Digger Dialects), a recent edition of a glossary of military slang used 
by Australians in World War I, and Moore (2003, A Lexicon of Cadet 
Language) covering modern Australian military jargon.

Laugesen today does not work as a linguist, but as a historian at the 
University of Southern Queensland. This is no drawback as can be 
seen in her thoughtful choice of sources and in the meticulous editing 
evident in this book. 

STRUCTURE

Diggerspeak is divided into several sections, viz. 'Introduction', a guide 
to 'The Entries', a 'Guide to Sources', i.e. a bibliography of the 
sources used and some works for further reading, and an 'A to Z of 
Words'.

The 'Introduction' is a superb account of theoretical and practical 
matters pertaining to the publication of a dictionary of Australian 
military slang. 

Laugesen rejects lexis that is in general use in the military of the 
English-speaking world. Her rationale is that ''The dictionary thus 
focuses primarily on 'Australian-only' words - that is, those words that 
became part of Australian English and were uniquely Australian. 
However, it also includes a selection of words shared with other 
English-speaking nations for which there is extensive evidence of 
Australian usage. These latter words have been included because 
they help to reveal something about the Australian experience of war.'' 
(Laugesen 2005:vii)

She also makes clear that hers is not an exhaustive collection of slang 
terms used by Australians during wartime. Only if a word could be 
attested in several sources and could be shown to have been used 
with some frequency, it qualified for inclusion. This decision leaves her 
with a limited number of entries, but, on the other hand, it also 
ensures that the items included are well-documented and can be 
rightly called an important part of AusE.

Laugesen cautiously points out that some of the words she looks at 
may have been around prior to the war when they were first 
recognized. Rather than being 'created' by war and wartime 
experiences, the use and applicability of these words was enhanced 
by certain circumstances to the extent that they entered mainstream 
use.

After these theoretical discussions Laugesen starts by recounting the 
major wars Australians have taken part in, from the Boer War (1899-
1902) to the Vietnam War (1957-75), thereby further delimiting her 
field of study. She critically evaluates the contribution of all of these 
conflicts to AusE. Since after the Vietnam War the army no longer 
contained any conscripted members and was an entirely professional 
one, she argues that it is at this point that ''diggerspeak'' ceases to be 
a feature of AusE in general and becomes just one of the many 
jargons used in that variety of English. Therefore she does not include 
material from later wars, a justifiable point of view.

Contributions to the Australian lexicon from the Boer War were fairly 
limited and often shared with their British brothers-in-arms. Food, 
fighting and a colonial identity have added a few, rare words to AusE, 
e.g. 'scoff', 'food'.

The case is much different for the next war. It is often argued that the 
First World War was a major step in the development of an Australian 
identity. It was here that 'digger' was first used as the common term for 
the honest and brave Australian soldier. There was also a clear 
recognition of the fact that Australians and the soldiers from other 
countries spoke distinct varieties of English and that they also differed 
culturally from each other. 

Sheer numbers made the impact of the Great War on Australia 
remarkable. More than ten per cent of the entire population of 
Australia served in the army, an astonishing number.

Contact with other Englishes as well as contact with other languages 
contributed to the formation of army slang, which was further 
elaborated by the application of the distinctively Australian suffixes -o 
and -ie. These started life around 1900 and for instance distinguished 
the Australianism 'wakie', the last day of a soldier's duty, from the 
Americanism 'wake-up' with the same meaning.

Some Arabic words were borrowed between 1914-18 and 
rediscovered in 1939-45, e.g. 'faloosh', 'money'. 

The Second World War was to some extent a different type of war 
from the previous one. There were different experiences, theatres of 
fighting, a new major enemy, the Japanese, and new types of warfare 
and military technology. No more trench-digging was required in an 
age ruled by tanks and powerful air forces. The experiences of 
Prisoner of War camps also added new lexis, specifically within 
Japanese camps.

The Korean War (1950-53) and the Malayan Emergency (1948-60) 
saw some Australian contingents, but almost no development in AusE 
military jargon.

The last conflict covered by Laugesen is the Vietnam War (1957-75). 
Language had become less censored with fewer restraints exercised 
by the army and the soldiers themselves. Although there were still 
genuine Australian coinages, the public view of this war became 
increasingly focused on America and Americanisms. The latter were 
even used by Australian soldiers writing about their experiences and 
the Australian media (Laugesen 2005:xvii). 

'The Entries' all begin with a headword and a definition. This is 
followed by the term's etymology, at least as far as possible. The 
definitions and etymologies are extensive and add an ''encyclopedic 
touch'' to the entries. This sets 'Diggerspeak' clearly apart from the 
hundreds of glossaries that simply list military jargon. 

After that the wars when this word was important are noted and 
representative quotes from each of these are given.

Next follows a 'Guide to Sources'. Laugesen has not tried to provide 
an exhaustive list of lexicons, glossaries and word lists. She has only 
selected those sources that seemed reliable and made clear where 
their terms, etymologies and definitions come from. The 31 
publications she does provide are, however, not her only sources. 
She also frequently quotes from many other sources, especially trench 
newspapers and memoirs. These should have been listed in this 
section, too, one of the few points of criticism that can be made 
about 'Diggerspeak'.

A list of books for 'Further Reading' concludes this section.

The main body of the book is comprised by the 'A to Z' glossary, 
covering 206 pages and approximately 400 entries. The first entry is 
ABDUL, a nickname for a Turkish soldier, the last ZIFF, a beard.

Some entries are now discussed in greater detail.

DIGGER, ''an Australian soldier who serves in wartime, often used as 
a form of address in both military and civilian contexts''.

Laugesen discusses the possibility that New Zealand soldiers were 
called 'digger' first and that this epithet was extended to Australian 
soldiers only later. But it seems unlikely that New Zealand 'gum-
diggers' could have committed such an act of linguistic imperialism, 
especially when 'digger' was so well established in AusE since the 
goldrushes of 1850s and already back then connoting qualities like 
bravery and honesty. Laugesen should have pointed this out with 
greater force and not present both as alternative explanations.

The Australian National Dictionary (AND), the leading historical 
dictionary of AusE, does not comment on the etymology of the term, 
but naturally has a much wider range of quotes to support its definition 
which is congruent with the one in 'Diggerspeak'.

Laugesen's entry covers more than three pages and is thus much 
more informative and useful than the entry of the same word in Arthur 
and Ramson (1990) which spans only half a page.

FURPHY, ''a rumour or false report; an absurd story''.

The etymology given is based on the theory that rumours spread with 
water carts manufactured by the firm J. Furphy and Sons, in WW I. 
This is in line with the AND and Arthur and Ramson (1990).

HUN, ''a German serviceman, the German military forces collectively; 
also the Germans as a people''.

This entry illustrates Laugesen's careful editing. From a number of 
disputed etymologies, disputed especially in Germany, she chose the 
right one and put it in the right historical context. Her entry contains 
much useful historical information which is laudable since neither the 
AND nor Arthur and Ramson (1990) list the term at all. Of course it 
must be mentioned here that HUN is neither a genuine AusE word nor 
that it has a special use in AusE that would distinguish it from other 
Englishes. But it certainly belongs in a dictionary of 'Australians at 
war'. On the other hand, this word shows how difficult it often is to 
decide whether the inclusion of a word is justified or justifiable.

POSSIE, ''an individual soldier's place of shelter or firing position; a 
position of advantage''.

The word is a real Australianism as the suffix clearly tells. In no other 
variety of English such a word formation would sound natural. POSSIE 
is also one the terms that made it into general AusE and which is still 
used today. The AND has a quote from a Tasmanian newspaper 
which wrote in 1984 ''locals say it could provide a good fishing possie''. 

CRITICAL EVALUATION

'Diggerspeak' can certainly be recommended for linguists and 
historians interested in AusE and the language and culture of 
Australians at war. The entries are of great quality and only 
restrictions of space sometimes seem to cut short the in-depth 
discussion of a term. 

Since it restricts itself to a comparatively small number of lexemes, it 
does not suffice as a stand-alone reference work on Australian military 
slang. But the words covered are excellently discussed in comparison 
to other publications in this field. It could have been an even better 
book if Laugesen had listed all her sources which would have enabled 
the researcher to dig in deeper in his/her special points of interest.

Finally, from a corpus-linguistic point of view, it would also have been 
good to include frequencies telling the reader how peripheral or 
central a certain term was in AusE army slang. But this is a point that 
could be raised for most, if not all historical dictionaries.

REFERENCES

Arthur, J. M. and William S. Ramson (1990) W.H. Downing's Digger 
Dialects. Melbourne: Oxford UP.

Brooks, Maureen and Joan Ritchie (1994) Words from the West: A 
Glossary of Western Australian Terms. Melbourne: Oxford UP.

Laugesen, Amanda (2002) Convict Words: Language in Early Colonial 
Australia. Melbourne: Oxford UP.

Moore, Bruce (2000) Gold! Gold! Gold!: The Language of the 
Nineteenth Century Gold Rushes. Melbourne: Oxford UP.

Moore, Burce (2003) A Lexicon of Cadet Language. Duntroon Slang 
1983-85. Melbourne: Oxford UP.

Ramson, William S. (1988) The Australian National Dictionary: A 
Dictionary of Australianisms on Historical Principles. Melbourne: 
Oxford University Press.

Robinson, Julia (2001) Voices of Queensland: Words from the 
Sunshine State. 

ABOUT THE REVIEWER


After studies in Regensburg, Germany, and Galway, Ireland, Clemens 
Fritz graduated with a master's degree in English and History in 1995. 
For ten years now he has worked and published on early Australian 
English. A particular focus is on Irish English and its survival in 
Australia. In 1998 he started a two-year teacher training programme 
and has been teaching English, history and drama in a German 
secondary school since 2000.





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1212	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:55:59 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1213, Review: Applied Ling: Bruthiaux et al. (2005)

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1213. Fri Apr 21 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1213, Review: Applied Ling: Bruthiaux et al. (2005)

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Lindsay Butler <lindsay@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

This LINGUIST List issue is a review of a book published by one of our
supporting publishers, commissioned by our book review editorial staff. We
welcome discussion of this book review on the list, and particularly invite
the author(s) or editor(s) of this book to join in. To start a discussion of
this book, you can use the Discussion form on the LINGUIST List website. For
the subject of the discussion, specify "Book Review" and the issue number of
this review. If you are interested in reviewing a book for LINGUIST, look for
the most recent posting with the subject "Reviews: AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW", and
follow the instructions at the top of the message. You can also contact the
book review staff directly.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 16-Apr-2006
From: Yasemin Kirkgoz < ykirkgoz@cu.edu.tr >
Subject: Directions in Applied Linguistics 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:52:00
From: Yasemin Kirkgoz < ykirkgoz@cu.edu.tr >
Subject: Directions in Applied Linguistics 
 

Announced at http://linguistlist.org/issues/16/16-2956.html 

EDITORS: Bruthiaux, Paul; Atkinson, Dwight; Eggington, William G.; 
Grabe, William, Ramanathan, Vaidehi
TITLE: Directions in Applied Linguistics
PUBLISHER: Multilingual Matters
YEAR: 2005

Yasemin Kirkgoz, Faculty of Education, Department of ELT, Lecturer 
in English Language Teaching at the University of Çukurova

OVERVIEW

''Directions in Applied Linguistics'' constitutes a collection of scholarly 
papers on areas directly relevant to the field of applied linguistics. Key 
issues explored in this 327-page collection are divided into 5 parts, 
each one opening with an introduction with commentary and a brief 
overview of the chapters by one of the editors of the book. Each part, 
focusing on different area, contains several chapters, which belongs 
to a different author. As mentioned in the introduction to Part 1, the 
book aims at giving insights into the nature and scope of applied 
linguistics presenting 'plurality of views, interests, and styles' (p.4). 
The book starts with a brief biographical description of each of the 26 
contributors to the volume and, ends with ''References'', followed by a 
section devoted to ''Biography and Publications of Robert Kaplan'' and 
a subject ''Index''. 

The following review is organized in the same sequence as the book 
is presented. A short summary of each article is given followed by my 
own evaluation.

DESCRIPTION

Part I ''Perspectives on Applied Linguistics'' opens the collection with 
two texts that provide the conceptual framework for the scope of 
applied linguistics. In this Introduction to Part 1, the editor Paul 
Bruthiaux provides a critical overview of all the chapters that make up 
the collection. Highlighted in this introductory chapter is the role that 
applied linguistics plays as bridging theory and practice, and having a 
direct relevance to the practices of various professionals including 
language educators and policy makers. Bruthiaux also notes the 
significant contribution made by the pioneering linguist, and a scholar 
of international repute Robert B. Kaplan on various areas of applied 
linguistics, particularly 'contrastive rhetoric', 'academic 
writing', 'language policy and planning'. Bruthiaux explains the major 
motivation behind the present volume as, in a sense, a tribute to 
Robert B. Kaplan, whose influence is reflected throughout the volume, 
and also from whose insightful research, pedagogical commitment and 
writings, countless researchers and graduate students benefited; and 
secondly to present to a wider readership a broad view of the 
conceptual framework for the scope of the applied linguistics, 
exploring its developments from the past into the present and the 
future.

Chapter 1 ''Applied Linguistics, Interdisciplinarity, and Disparate 
Realities'', by Henry G. Widdowson, identifies two related features that 
would have to be met for any work to be considered applied 
linguistics: a concern with 'real-world', and 'interdisciplinary'. 
Widdowson argues that interdisciplinarity, itself is a tenuous concept, 
operating on a level of abstraction, thus if we are to engage in real-
world issues, we need to develop a methodological approach that 
might mediate between these two aspects of reality and to achieve 
conceptual unity. A distinctive feature of this consensus, Widdowson 
argues, should be an emphasis put by applied linguistics on examining 
how the abstractions favored by applied linguistics can be put to 
systematic test against the actuality of everyday existence. 

In Chapter 2 ''Is Language Policy Applied Linguistics?'', Bernard 
Spolsky, while exploring the multiple connections between applied 
linguistics and language policy, argues for an intermediate field 
naming it with his preferred label 'educational linguistics', which aims 
to unite all the fields relevant to language education. In this respect, 
he shares with Widdowson the common view that applied linguistics 
does not merely consist of applying theory to solve real-world 
problems. Spolsky, then, analyzes the involvement of applied linguists 
to language policy, through a number of chronological yet overlapping 
stages in historical progression, such as language reformers and 
language planning experts. He concludes by drawing attention to the 
ongoing expansion and redefinition of the applied linguistics field with 
the contribution of pioneers like Robert Kaplan.

Part 2 ''Language Education''. In the 'Introduction' to Part 2, Vaidehi 
Ramanathan introduces the theme of Language Education by noting 
the common concern of educational change using the 
metaphor 'elaborate machineries' to refer to educational systems 
worldwide, and to highlight education's having both mechanistic as 
well as dynamic nature. She notes that as educators with varying 
backgrounds and interests we participate in creating 'knowledge' in 
our 'disciplinary thought collectives' (Ramanathan, 2002), illustrating 
how aspects of this knowledge can sometimes become part of a larger 
machinery. Taking the view of larger socio-educational machineries, 
Ramanathan argues that change is an inevitable part of this socio-
educational enterprise and as researchers; we are responsible 
partially for change. She introduces three chapters in this section of 
the volume, which address various aspects of this change.

In Chapter 3 ''Sharing Community Languages: Utopian Dream or 
Realistic Vision?'', Michael Clyne argues that the sharing of community 
languages in multicultural societies is no utopia, but can be achieved 
through a realistic policy. First, Clyne explores historical development 
of language policies on the teaching of English as a second language 
and languages other than English (LOTEs), that is, Australian 
indigenous languages. Clyne notes that particular language policies 
have traditionally discouraged one group of people from maintaining 
their bilingualism while spending huge amounts of money to make 
others bilingual by teaching them a language other than English. As 
part of an assimilation policy, Australia had an implicit negative policy 
towards LOTE. The chapter ends with a call for cultivating a society 
that validates and rewards multilingualism. 

Chapter 4 ''Documenting Cultural Reform: Innovative Foreign 
Language Education in Elementary School'' is co-authored by Rocio 
Dominguez, G. Richard Tucker and Richard Donato, and reports their 
involvement in a two-year curriculum reform project on the Spanish 
Foreign Language Programs in Elementary School (FLES) involving 
the introduction of literacy skills in the K-5 curriculum. The study 
documents how teachers participating in the early literacy program 
(PACE) integrate literacy skills by drawing on stories, folktales, and 
legends to capture the children's interests and encourage them to use 
the Target language communicatively. The study presents successes 
and challenges in implementing the curricular innovation, and 
highlights the interplay of socio cultural factors influencing the 
educational change such as cultural beliefs, political climate, economic 
conditions, administrative support, and language planning factors. 

In Chapter 5 ''Research Perspectives on Non-native English Speaking 
Educators'', Lia D. Kamhi-Stein addresses the issue of native /non-
native (NES/NNES) dichotomy, presenting a summary of research 
focusing on these constructs especially as they are related to the role 
of 'non-native' language teachers in language education. She 
continues her discussion with NNES educators' self-perceptions as 
class teachers such as perceptions of their language proficiency and 
instructional practices; the relationship between their language 
proficiency and professionalism; the role of race and language status 
in relation to the 'ideal English teacher'. She then explores the 
research focusing on how 'others' -- program administrators and 
language students - perceive NNES educators. Kamhi-Stein calls for 
future research that would more importantly deal with NNES 
educators' levels of English language competence in relation to 
curriculum delivery rather than issues of self-perceptions of language 
proficiency. 

Part 3 ''English for Academic Purposes''. In his introduction to the third 
section in the volume, Dwight Atkinson takes a personal view of 
Robert B. Kaplan's work, highlighting his influence on English for 
Academic Purposes (EAP), which is strongly reflected in the four 
chapters featured in this section of the volume. Atkinson also mentions 
a less well-known aspect of Kaplan's career, that is, his powerful 
contribution through his mentorship of countless graduate students 
and individuals with no particular connection to him.

In Chapter 6 ''Reflections of a 'Blue Collar Linguist:' Analysis of Written 
Discourse, Classroom Research, and EAP Pedagogy'', Dana R. Ferris 
starts with a discussion of the different 'collars' worn by applied 
linguists -from blue to white. Focusing on her own area of 
specialization -the analysis of written discourse- she identifies four 
categories of second language writing scholars, operating along a 
continuum that extends from the most theoretical (white collar) to the 
most practical (blue collar). For Ferris, blue collar applied linguists are 
those who work on real-world problems in ESL settings, while white 
collar applied linguists engage with social theory- still problem oriented 
in many cases but without the concrete focus of blue collar work. 
Tracing her own evolution as a researcher, Ferris discusses how she 
turned from a theory-driven descriptive researcher into a practice-
driven applied linguistics, solving problems and investigating research 
questions of ESL students, and back again. Finally, she questions the 
usefulness of such a divide and suggests that all applied linguists 
need to incorporate one another's insights into their thinking and into 
their work. 

Chapter 7 ''English for Academic Purposes: Issues in Undergraduate 
Writing and Reading'', by Ann M. Johns, reflecting her lengthy 
experience in EAP, provides an up-to-date account of the teaching of 
academic literacy, as it relates to the apprenticeship of academic 
writing by undergraduate students. She begins by posing four major 
questions pertinent to academic writing, which gave rise to research, 
and heated debate. Next, she describes in detail, three areas of 
current EAP research that can help us answer her questions: the 
social construction of texts, in which ''the texts are being treated as 
living documents with which writers, readers, discourse communities, 
and other texts interact'' (p. 105). She touches upon three areas 
particularly valuable for academic literacy teachers: moves analysis, 
voice and author's stance, and multiliteracies, which involves writers 
integrating effective visual representations into their texts. She follows 
this with 'applications' by illustrating how classroom practitioners can 
make use of current literacy research and theory in their practices, at 
the same time summarizing the current answers to the four questions 
she posed at the beginning of her chapter. 

In Chapter 8 '''Ear' Learners and Errors in US College Writing'', Joy 
Reid examines the language problems of what she calls 'second-
generation US resident ESL student writers of academic English', a 
population that acquired English mainly through their 'ears'. This 
group is characterized as having a high level of communicative 
fluency, yet having persistent accuracy problems. She then contrasts 
this population with 'eye' learners, international students, who move to 
US for post-secondary education after a significant period of 
preparation in their home countries. Reid then discusses types of 
errors EAP teachers typically encounter in the writing of 'ear' learners, 
and makes innovative suggestions for their remediation. Reid 
concludes by calling for further research and development regarding 
instruction into immigrant student errors arguing that error gravity is 
essential to developing appropriate approaches and curricula for such 
learners.

Chapter 9 ''Teachers' Perceptions of Lexical Anomalies: A Pilot Study'', 
by Cheryl Bold Zimmerman, following a similar approach to the 
previous chapter, discusses an empirical study of native speakers of 
English teachers' response to lexical anomalies -inaccurate usages of 
words - produced by second language (L2) writers. Having given a 
description of errors most frequently made by L2 learners under the 
categories: Collocations, Language conventions/Set Phrases and 
Meaning, Zimmerman introduces her research, which investigates 
teachers' perceptions of certain lexical anomalies, how they identify 
patterns for generalization, and strategies they use to explain such 
anomalies. Participants in Zimmerman's study were fourteen native 
ESL teachers, with an experience of teaching a vocabulary class but 
without a formal instruction in vocabulary teaching.  The study 
revealed gaps in the formal lexical knowledge of the teachers, as the 
teachers were not very accurate in categorizing the anomalies of the 
items from a vocabulary research perspective. She then argues that 
teachers' familiarity with lexical concepts is needed so that they can 
better provide for effective remediation of student lexical difficulties. 
This, in turn, implies that teacher preparation programs should 
promote teachers' essential language awareness so that they can 
better apply theory to practice. 

Introducing Part 4 ''Contrastive Discourse Analysis'', William Grabe 
discusses how Kaplan's insight originated, mainly out of practical 
observation of the academic writings of ESL students, and how this 
constituted the core of Contrastive analysis of academic discourse.

Chapter 10 ''Tertium Comparationis: A Vital Component in 
Constrastive Rhetoric Research'', co-authored by Ulla M. Connor and 
Ana I. Moreno, proposes an innovative theoretical framework for 
contrastive rhetoric research using corpora that can be compared with 
equivalent English corpora, highlighting the importance of tertium 
comparationis or common ground of comparison at the design and 
analysis stages of the research. They first describe the beneficial 
effect corpus linguistics has on contrastive studies referring to 
Johansson's (1998:3) classification of three types of corpora: parallel 
corpora, translation corpora and learner corpora, of which learner 
corpora has been the most common in contrastive rhetorical studies 
as it allows for the examination of interlanguage errors between native 
language writing and the target language. Describing the use of 
comparative corpora in the studies of contrastive rhetoric, they argue 
that contrastive rhetoric should describe and explain differences or 
similarities in text-patterns across cultures on the basis of comparable 
parallel corpora of texts. Connor and Moreno discuss the criteria for 
the design of comparable parallel corpora, and conclude the chapter 
by a proposal of a summary of the approach contrastive rhetoric 
methodology can use for establishing parallel corpora.

Chapter 11 ''Structure and Style in the Narrative Writings of Mexican-
American and African-American Adolescents'', co-authored by Ann 
Daubney-Davis and Genevieve Patthey-Chavez, extends contrastive 
rhetoric by exploring the structure and discourse features of narrative 
writing of 7th grade secondary students, Mexican-American and 
African-American from the same school by analyzing texts for stylistic 
features of the narratives. The study uses a social and cognitive 
approach to text analysis followed by extended classroom 
observations of students. In her discussion of the data drawn from 
Ann Daubney-Davis's field work, Patthey-Chavez first justifies 
choosing narrative writing as a conceptually familiar task for students 
of this age, and one that could be produced by the students 
themselves. Student narratives were collected in five 7th grade 
classrooms on two occasions. Data was examined from multiple 
dimensions focusing on structure, convention and style. The analysis 
of narrative writing showed that both groups of students wrote in very 
similar ways as far as writing conventions and syntactic structures 
were concerned. However, considerable within-group variation was 
recorded in the types of narrative development. Patthey-Chavez 
argues that the narrative genre provides a good source for exploring 
culturally distinct influences on writing, especially for minority 
secondary school students. 

Chapter 12 ''Functions of Personal Examples and Narratives in L1 and 
L2 Academic Prose'', Eli Hinkel explores the concept of 'evidence' in 
writing by examining the frequency of exemplification markers, first 
and third person pronouns, and occurrences of past tense verbs, in 
NS and NNS academic essays at the university level to determine 
whether these two groups of students differ in their use of examples in 
the argumentation and exposition essays. In her discussion of the 
function of exemplification in non-Anglo-American Rhetorical 
traditions, and exemplification in academic writing in English, Hinkel 
persuasively argues that many Asian L2 writers from Chinese, 
Japanese, and Korean backgrounds employ examples, and linguistic 
features of examples in their essays due to their familiarity with the 
concept of examples since that rhetoric strategy is emphasized in their 
L1 education. In Hinkel's study, NNS writers were 317 L1 speakers of 
Chinese, Japanese and Korean, and 127 NS graduates of US 
students. All participants were asked to write an essay in response to 
one of the prompts given, and each essay was subjected to a detailed 
analysis. The results of the analysis showed that NNS students used 
example markers at significantly higher frequencies than do NS 
writers. In the conclusion, Hinkel proposes modifications to L2 
academic writing instruction to take students' academic background 
into consideration.

In Chapter 13 ''Cross-cultural Variation in Classroom Turn-taking 
Practices'', Deborah Poole reviews cross-cultural studies of language 
use in the way teachers cue interactional turns in second and foreign 
language classroom settings. Poole first reports classroom accounts 
of turn taking from mainly English speaking contexts in the US, then 
from a variety of other cultural settings, which suggests that turn-
taking practices are linked to their socio-cultural contexts. Poole 
argues that her investigation of turn taking presents a complex picture 
of similarities and differences across various contexts. Poole 
concludes her review by suggesting that teachers of L2 students from 
diverse backgrounds should understand possible turn-taking 
experiences through which their students are socialized into 
classroom, and should thus have practical cross-cultural problem 
solving knowledge to make their own interactional choices.

Part 5 ''Language Policy and Planning''. In the introduction to the final 
section of the volume, William G. Eggington shows the richness of the 
field of language policy and planning. He illustrates how Kaplan's work 
in this particular area has had a strong theoretical underpinning, 
specifically in terms of the eight major constructs which are taken up, 
as points of departure, in the four chapters contained in this section of 
the volume. 

Chapter 14, ''Micro Language Planning'', by Richard Baldauf Jr., 
addresses micro language planning issues within an established 
language-planning framework by raising the question whether micro 
language planning should be explored as a way of solving small-scale 
language problems. Baldauf first outlines how macro language policy 
and planning can be conceived, and he provides a review of the 
research dealing with conceptualizing framework for language 
planning goals. He then discusses micro language planning by raising 
the question whether the macro language framework, or elements of it 
can be realized through micro implementation of macro planning. 
Baldauf concludes by suggesting that micro language planning 
approaches deserve much wider and closer attention. 

Chapter 15 ''The Englishization of Spanish in Mexico'', by Robert J. 
Baumgardner, starts with a review of 'Englishization' of Mexican 
Spanish, offering a brief history of English borrowings in Spanish. 
Baumgardner then describes efforts to prevent English intrusion, 
indicating the relationship between corpus planning and status 
planning. He shows that the efforts made by the Mexican Academy 
of Language against Anglicisms to keep the language 'pure' were 
short-lived and ineffective. Baumgardner then traces English 
borrowings in Mexican Spanish today, which shows itself mainly 
through manifestation of 'loan words', 'calques' and 'hybridization'. 
In the conclusion, Baumgardner seeks for an answer to the question 
whether Mexican English is in danger of being contaminated by 
English or not.

In Chapter 16 ''Including Discourse in Language Planning Theory'', 
Joseph Lo Bianco argues for the recognition of 'discourse planning' 
which he characterizes as ''an element of language planning theory or 
as an object of research for language planning theories'' (p.256), as a 
legitimate component of language planning from two complementary 
aspects; first, to include discourse planning within the framework of 
language planning studies; secondly, to include the dimensions of 
discourse to the understanding of specific language problems. He 
elaborates his call for the inclusion of discourse in language planning 
by discussing discourse with respect to status, corpus, acquisition, 
usage, and esteem planning. In the conclusion, Lo Bianco suggests 
that language-planning studies need to include policy analysis that 
theorizes power. 

In Chapter 17 ''World-Language: Foreign Language Policy in 
Hungary'', Peter Medgyes reports on the foreign language educational 
reform in Hungary by giving a detailed account of the process of 
planning, implementing and evaluating a set of measures designed to 
promote the teaching of foreign languages. Medgyes demonstrates 
that changes taking place in the foreign language needs and the 
provision of foreign languages in Hungary stem from multitude of 
circumstances, political and economic factors and individual 
preferences. He then gives a description of the 'World-Language' 
program initiated by the Hungarian Ministry of Education, a language-
in-education planning approach aimed at promoting the acquisition of 
German, English, or French in elementary school. However, Medgyes 
suggests that this plan could be weakened because it has not been 
part of a comprehensive language policy. Throughout, he emphasizes 
that the challenges posed by language planning and language-in-
education planning in Hungary must be handled in a continuous cycle 
of planning, implementation and evaluation.

CRITICAL EVALUATION

''Directions in Applied Linguistics'' is a significant contribution to the 
field of applied linguistics, for the insights it offers into current 
directions into the field, detailed exploration of issues informed by 
theory while at the same time paying honor to the influential works of 
Robert B. Kaplan. 

Perhaps, the most positive quality of this book is the breadth and 
depth by which several key issues in the field of applied linguistics are 
addressed. Each chapter is clearly laid-out and well written. The 
chapters are appropriately grouped under the thematically organized 
sections. Due to the multitude of issues explored, some readers may 
find only certain chapters addressing their particular interests. The 
editors' Introduction proves particularly beneficial by providing an 
overview on which the chapters' contents are based, and is extremely 
useful to provide the reader with essential background information 
before proceeding to read the texts.
 
Another strong feature of this volume lies in its up-to-date and 
authentic illustrations of such themes. The articles are supported with 
substantial research, and help to provide readers with updated 
information about the topics. The collection of papers also represents 
an international selection of authors and studies. 

As stated in the Introduction, the book would primarily interest 
linguists, researchers, graduate students in Applied Linguistics, and 
language planners and policy makers. The wealth of illustrations, the 
detail of discussion makes this book an extremely useful reference for 
those involved in Applied Linguistics studies.

REFERENCES

Johansson, S. 1998. 'On the role of corpora in cross-linguistic 
research' in S. Johannson and S. Oksefjell (eds.) Corpora and Cross-
linguistic Research: Theory, Method, and Case Studies. Amsterdam: 
Rodopi.

Ramanathan, V. 2002. The Politics of TESOL Education: writing, 
Knowledge, Critical Pedagogy. New York: RoutledgeFalmer. 

ABOUT THE REVIEWER


Yasemin Kirkgoz is an Assistant Professor in the Department of 
English Language Teaching at the University of Çukurova, Turkey. 
Her research interests include English for Academic Purposes, 
classroom based research, language education and language policy.





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1213	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Fri, 21 Apr 2006 21:10:09 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1214, Review: Software/Morphology: Alchemist 2.0 (1st review)

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1214. Fri Apr 21 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1214, Review: Software/Morphology: Alchemist 2.0 (1st review)

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Lindsay Butler <lindsay@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

This LINGUIST List issue is a review of a book published by one of our
supporting publishers, commissioned by our book review editorial staff. We
welcome discussion of this book review on the list, and particularly invite
the author(s) or editor(s) of this book to join in. To start a discussion of
this book, you can use the Discussion form on the LINGUIST List website. For
the subject of the discussion, specify "Book Review" and the issue number of
this review. If you are interested in reviewing a book for LINGUIST, look for
the most recent posting with the subject "Reviews: AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW", and
follow the instructions at the top of the message. You can also contact the
book review staff directly.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Oliver Streiter < ostreiter@web.de >
Subject: Alchemist 2.0 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Fri, 21 Apr 2006 20:59:23
From: Oliver Streiter < ostreiter@web.de >
Subject: Alchemist 2.0 
 

CREATORS: Sprague, Colin; Hu, Yu
TITLE: Alchemist
VERSION: 2.0 
AVAILABLE AT: http://linguistica.uchicago.edu/alchemist.html

Oliver Streiter, Department of Western Languages and Literature, National
University of Kaohsiung, Taiwan

INTRODUCTION

Alchemist is a tool that allows users to read in raw text files and create a
morphological analysis in XML format that can be used as a ''gold standard'' for
evaluating the results of an unsupervised morphological analyzer. The user
manually identifies morphemes and categorizes them as root or affix, together
with, optionally, a degree of certainty of the analyst. In addition, morphemes
can be assigned morphosyntactic features, such as part of speech, person,
number, and gender. The tool is intended for researchers who want to perform a
linguistic analysis and store their data in a standard format. Given its clear
and attractive interface, the tool might be effectively used for in-class
exercises on morphological analysis.

Alchemist can be freely downloaded from http://linguistica.uchicago.edu/, in a
binary version for Windows and Mac OS X, or as source code e.g. for Linux/Unix
environments. The type of license, however, under which the tool can be
downloaded is not specified. The software is documented in a 19-page PDF file,
accessible from the same site.

SYNOPSIS

The first step in using Alchemist is to create a new GOLD standard collection
from an input text file (RTF or plain text). Then, the user has to specify the
maximal number of words in the list, e.g. 200 or 500 words. Before the word list
is created, the user can select or create some rules to 'scrub' the text. It is
thus possible to remove unwanted numbers or HTML markup. New scrubbing rules can
be added in the form of regular expressions. Once created, scrubbing rules can
be saved and loaded in a later session.

Using the white space character as predefined word delimiter, the tool creates a
word list from the input text. This word list, called Word Collection, can be
sorted from left to right and from right to left to discover prefixes or
suffixes respectively. To facilitate the discovery of morphemes, the words in
the Word Collection can also be filtered using regular expressions. The
documentation contains a number of interesting examples of possible filters.

Using the mouse pointer, the user can mark roots and affixes in the Word
Collection. Roots and affixes are then highlighted in different colors in the
Word Collection. In addition, the morphemes, their types ('root' or 'affix') and
the words in which they occur show up automatically in a list of morphemes,
called the Morpheme Explorer. The same morpheme derived from different words and
allomorphs can be merged in this Morpheme Explorer in a fairly intuitive way.
The morphemes in the Morpheme Explorer can be also used as filter of the word
collection. Thus, clicking on one or more affixes followed by the button 'Show
Filtered' will cause all words containing this affix to be listed in the Word
Collection. Using this filter, the user can jump in a very easy and efficient
way from an affix to a root, from the root to other affixes etc.

The Word Collection and its analysis can be stored in XML as GOLD standard
(General Ontology for Linguistic Descriptions,
http://www.linguistics-ontology.org/) standard. In later sessions, the user can
open this XML document and continue the analysis. Merging two analyses or adding
one text to an existing analysis doesn't seem to be possible.

EVALUATION

The software documentation is well written and contains a detailed description
of all functions of Alchemist. However the documentation does not mention the
license. It neither covers the installation process. While installation on Mac
OS X and Windows was as smooth as it can be, I abandoned the compilation of
Alchemist under Linux after compilation stopped with a cryptic message and
neither the software documentation, nor the contact person, nor a Web-search
provided any helpful information.

The documentation also lacks a discussion of wider contexts in which the tool
can be used. The user's acquaintance with the GOLD standard, or at least the
willingness to use this is taken for granted. Explaining the GOLD standard and
its usefulness in the introduction of the documentation would increase the
relevance of the tool.

The web-page of Alchemist does not contain additional information. There doesn't
seem to be any active user group, help desk, mailing list or any other kind of
information structure through which users and developers might interact.

The design of the interface is excellent. It integrates a nice help function.
The usage is as intuitive as it can be. Singular windows however cannot be
resized. Additional space might be gained by putting the R,A,C buttons after the
Help button.

When testing the tool in different contexts, the tool, however, does no longer
seem as mature as its interface and the documentation suggest. The most serious
problem is related to the encoding of the input text file. Unlike a web-browser,
there is no way to specify the encoding of the input file. The tool assumes
uniformly that files have been encoded in Latin-1 (ISO 8869-1). Alchemist thus
produces broken graphical representations for all other encodings, e.g. German,
Spanish or French in Unicode. Characters using more than one bite are split into
meaningless symbols. As a consequence, the tool is limited to the Latin script
and within the Latin script only those writing systems which fall within the
scope of ISO 8859-1.

Thus not only many East and Central Asian languages but also many richly
accented African languages cannot be processed by Alchemist unless
transliterated into a form which falls within the scope of ISO 8859-1. To make
it clear, this excludes writing systems using the Arabic script, the Abugida
script, the Chinese script, the Cyrillic scripts, in addition to about 100 other
scripts. Excluded are also many languages using the Latin script but not
included in ISO 8859-1, e.g Czech (ISO 8859-2) and Turkish (ISO 8859-9). This
failure to support Unicode should be corrected in future versions if the tools
is to have any relevance.

The input and output functions reveal additional problems. Although the input
text file can be an RTF-file or a plain text file, the RTF-file I created with
OpenOffice, was not processed correctly and RTF tags showed up in the Word
Collection. Thus using plain text input files seems to be the only feasible
option. The XML output contains huge amounts of rubbish characters. Strictly
speaking, this is fool's gold and not XML. An inexperienced user would discard
the output and with it the entire tool.

A problematic procedure is the transformation of the input text into word lists.
Although this transformation is relatively easy for English, there is no general
procedure which can do this transformation for all writing systems of the world
without consulting a linguistic database. The white space characters, the
hyphen, the apostrophe may or may not be, according to the writing system, part
of a word. Thus even common languages like French or Italian are processed
incorrectly in Alchemist as two words joined by a ''''' are not split. Languages
that can have a white space character within a words, e.g. Vietnamese and
Sesotho (Roux 2005, Streiter & Stuflesser 2005) and languages without a word
separator require more advanced techniques.

While transforming the Word Collection in a collection of morphemes I
encountered the following problem. In some cases I would like to have a link
back to the text in which a word occurred. Ambiguous words, e.g. 'reports' can
be understood only in context and providing a KWIC view of the word might reveal
whether it is a verb or a noun. In addition, when I tried to undo an analysis
and deleted the affix from the Morpheme Explorer, the affix disappeared also
from the data in the Word Collection. Clicking on one character in the Word
Collection and deleting the related root in the Morpheme Explorer splits the
root into two roots. I do not know whether this is an intended behavior. Overall
the possibilities to undo an analysis or go back to an earlier stage in the
analysis are not given.

Finally, there are some minor problems:

* Using the Help-function, the tool crashed several times after a few (maybe
inexact) mouse movements on Mac OS X. Unsaved data where then lost.

* The filter on the Word Collection and the Sorting of the Word Collection do
not interact in a meaningful way. When a filter is used, words are sorted from
left to right. When words are sorted from right to left, no filter can be used.
I can however think of no linguistic motivation why both techniques should not
be used in combination.

* Sometimes the system shows an unexpected outcome, e.g. after the deletion of a
word from the Word Collection, the system falls back on the last morpheme-based
filter.

SUMMARY

Overall, Alchemist is a very promising tool which will certainly find its way
onto the linguist's Desktop. It is well designed, easy to use and produces an
output in an important standard. However, the tool is not as solid as one would
wish it to be. The main problem is that it does not support Unicode. This
however might be solved easily in future releases. Non-Unicode encoded files
could then be converted on the fly to Unicode using functionalities similar to
ICONV. To overcome the difficulties in the creation of word lists will require
more linguistic intelligence, e.g. in the form of a linguistic database.
Finally, it can be hoped that the developing team will succeed in building a
community around the tool, so that new users can join discussion groups when
seeking support. This will also provide the feedback necessary to overcome last
problems with buttons, windows and file formats. After all, alchemy was not that
unsuccessful, except in the production of gold. The Alchemist however promises
something better, it will help you to produce a gold standard.

REFEREBCES  

Roux, J. C. (2005), Results of the African Speech Technology (AST) Project,
www.ast.sun.ac.za/publications/AST_Final.PDF.

Streiter, O. & Stuflesser, M. (2005), XNLRDF, the Open Source Framework for
Multilingual Computing, Lesser Used Languages & Computer Linguistics, European
Academy Bozen/Bolzano, Italy, 27th-28th October 2005,
http://140.127.211.214/publs/files/nlrdf_lulcl_10.pdf.


ABOUT THE REVIEWER

Oliver Streiter teaches computational linguistics and corpus linguistics at the
National University of Kaohsiung, Taiwan. His current research focuses on the
compilation and annotation of linguistic resources to support low density
languages.





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1214	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 10:04:22 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1215, Jobs: Spanish/Phonetics/Phonology: Prof/Lecturer, MI

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1215. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1215, Jobs: Spanish/Phonetics/Phonology: Prof/Lecturer, MI

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Vanessa Manion <vanessa@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

The LINGUIST List strongly encourages employers to use
non-discriminatory standards in hiring policy. In particular we urge
that employers do not discriminate on the grounds of race, ethnicity,
nationality, age, religion, gender, or sexual orientation. However, we
have no means of enforcing these standards.

Job seekers should pay special attention to language in ads regarding
employment requirements and are encouraged to consult our international
employment page http://linguistlist.org/jobs/jobnet.html. This page has been set 
up so that people can report on the employment standards of various countries.

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 21-Apr-2006
From: Elizabeth Humpert < bhumpert@umich.edu >
Subject: Spanish & Phonetics/Phonology: Visiting Prof or Lecturer, University of Michigan, MI, USA 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 10:00:40
From: Elizabeth Humpert < bhumpert@umich.edu >
Subject: Spanish & Phonetics/Phonology: Visiting Prof or Lecturer, University of Michigan, MI, USA 
 

University or Organization: University of Michigan 
Department: Romance Languages and Literatures
Job Rank: Visiting Professor or Lecturer I  
Specialty Areas: Phonetics; Phonology 
Required Language(s): Spanish (spa)


Description:

The Department of Romance Languages and Literatures at the University of
Michigan invites applications for a one semester visiting position in
Spanish Linguistics Winter term, 1/1/07-4/30/07. Area of specialization is
open, but we will be especially interested in candidates who can teach in
one or more of the following areas of Spanish Linguistics: 
phonetics-phonology; sociolinguistics; dialectology, language variation and
change; language contact. The position involves teaching 2 or 3
undergraduate courses during the Winter semester. The successful candidate
must have PhD in hand. Women and minorities are encouraged to apply.
University of Michigan is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.


Address for Applications:

	Ms. Elizabeth Humpert 
	812 E. Washington St. 
	4108 MLB 
	Ann Arbor, MI 48109-1275 
	USA  

Application Deadline: 15-Aug-2006 

Contact Information:

	Professor Teresa Satterfield 
	Email: tsatter@umich.edu 
	Phone: 734-647-2332 
	Fax: 734-764-8163 
	Website: http://www.lsa.umich.edu/rll/





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1215	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 11:53:03 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1216, Jobs: Arabic/Applied Linguistics: Lecturer, Georgetown U

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1216. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1216, Jobs: Arabic/Applied Linguistics: Lecturer, Georgetown U

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Vanessa Manion <vanessa@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

The LINGUIST List strongly encourages employers to use
non-discriminatory standards in hiring policy. In particular we urge
that employers do not discriminate on the grounds of race, ethnicity,
nationality, age, religion, gender, or sexual orientation. However, we
have no means of enforcing these standards.

Job seekers should pay special attention to language in ads regarding
employment requirements and are encouraged to consult our international
employment page http://linguistlist.org/jobs/jobnet.html. This page has been set 
up so that people can report on the employment standards of various countries.

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 21-Apr-2006
From: Elizabeth M. Bergman < emb@georgetown.edu >
Subject: Arabic/Applied Linguistics: Lecturer, Georgetown University, Washington, DC, USA 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 11:49:29
From: Elizabeth M. Bergman < emb@georgetown.edu >
Subject: Arabic/Applied Linguistics: Lecturer, Georgetown University, Washington, DC, USA 
 

University or Organization: Georgetown University 
Department: Center for Advanced Proficiency in Arabic
Job Rank: Lecturer  
Specialty Areas: Applied Linguistics; Arabic
Required Language(s): Arabic, Standard (arb)


Description:

The Arabic Language Flagship Program (ALF) of Georgetown University's
Center for Advanced Proficiency in Arabic at Georgetown University is
seeking a full-time instructor of Modern Standard and Levantine (Jordanian,
Lebanese, Palestinian, or Syrian) Arabic.  

ALF instructors teach in an innovative program for American students of
Arabic at advanced levels.  Classes are small and intensive.  Instructors
teach approximately 12 hours per week.   In addition, they contribute to
materials development and help coordinate non-classroom-based learning
activities. 

Successful applicants have 
- native or near-native speaker ability in Arabic, and 
- experience in communicative, proficiency-based, and/or content-based
teaching of Arabic.  

The ideal applicant holds an advanced degree in applied linguistics or a
related field, and has significant teaching experience.  

Please send application, curriculum vitae, and names of three references to
the address below, or by email to:  capa@georgetown.edu.  
The Center for Advanced Proficiency in Arabic may also be contacted by
phone at 202-687-3925.  

Review of applications begins on 25 April; search will continue until
position is filled.  Georgetown is a Catholic and Jesuit, student-centered
research university and candidates are encouraged to read its mission
statement on the university's website. Georgetown University is Affirmative
Action/Equal Opportunity Employer.  Women and minorities are especially
invited to apply.


Address for Applications 

	CAPA 
	Center for Advanced Proficiency in Arabic 
	P.O. Box 571129 
	Georgetown University 
	Washington, DC 20057 
	USA  

Application Deadline: Open until filled.

Contact Information

	CAPA 
	Email: capa@georgetown.edu 
	Phone: 202.687.3925 
	Website: http://www.georgetown.edu/departments/arabic/capa.html





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1216	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 14:56:12 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1217, Books: Morphology: Booij, Van Marle (Eds)

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1217. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1217, Books: Morphology: Booij, Van Marle (Eds)

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Maria Moreno-Rollins <maria@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

Links to the websites of all LINGUIST's supporting publishers
are available at the end of this issue. 


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 21-Apr-2006
From: Jasper de Vaal < jasper.devaal@springer-sbm.com >
Subject: Yearbook of Morphology 2005: Booij, Van Marle (Eds) 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 14:54:31
From: Jasper de Vaal < jasper.devaal@springer-sbm.com >
Subject: Yearbook of Morphology 2005: Booij, Van Marle (Eds) 
 



Title: Yearbook of Morphology 2005 
Series Title: Yearbook of Morphology  

Publication Year: 2006 
Publisher: Springer
	   http://www.springer.com
	

Book URL: http://www.springer.com/1-4020-4065-2 


Editor: Geert Booij, Free University Amsterdam
Editor: Jaap van Marle, Open University, Heerlen, The Netherlands

Hardback: ISBN: 1402040652 Pages: 315 Price: Europe EURO 139.00
Hardback: ISBN: 1402040652 Pages: 315 Price: U.K. £ 107.00
Hardback: ISBN: 1402040652 Pages: 315 Price: U.S. $ 179.00


Abstract:

The only international periodical devoted to linguistic morphology. Widely
considered to be the best series of publications on morphology at the
international level, and is referred to very frequently in linguistic
publications. A revival of interest in morphology has occurred during
recent years. The periodical Yearbook of Morphology, published since 1988,
has proven to be an eminent support for this upswing of morphological
research, and has shown that morphology is central to present-day
linguistic theorizing.

In the Yearbook of Morphology 2005 a number of important theoretical issues
are discussed: the role of inflectional paradigms in morphological
analysis, the differences between words and affixes, and the adequacy of
competing models of word structure.

In addition, the role of phonological factors in shaping complex words is
discussed. Evidence for particular positions defended in this volume is
taken from a wide variety of languages. This volume is of interest to those
working in theoretical, descriptive and historical linguistics,
morphologists, phonologists, computational linguists, and psycholinguists 



Linguistic Field(s): Morphology


Written In: English  (eng)
	
See this book announcement on our website: 
http://linguistlist.org/get-book.html?BookID=19212


MAJOR SUPPORTERS

	Blackwell Publishing          
		http://www.blackwellpublishing.com	

	Cambridge University Press          
		http://us.cambridge.org	

	Cascadilla Press          
		http://www.cascadilla.com/	

	Continuum International Publishing Group Ltd          
		http://www.continuumbooks.com	

	Edinburgh University Press          
		http://www.eup.ed.ac.uk/	

	European Language Resources Association          
		http://www.elda.org/sommaire.php	

	Georgetown University Press          
		http://www.press.georgetown.edu	

	Hodder Arnold          
		http://www.hoddereducation.co.uk	

	John Benjamins          
		http://www.benjamins.com/	

	Lawrence Erlbaum Associates          
		http://www.erlbaum.com/	

	Lincom GmbH          
		http://www.lincom.at	

	MIT Press          
		http://mitpress.mit.edu/	

	Mouton de Gruyter          
		http://www.mouton-publishers.com	

	Multilingual Matters          
		http://www.multilingual-matters.com/	

	Oxford University Press          
		http://www.oup.com/us	

	Palgrave Macmillan          
		http://www.palgrave.com	

	Rodopi          
		http://www.rodopi.nl/	

	Routledge (Taylor and Francis)          
		http://www.routledge.com/	

	Springer          
		http://www.springer.com	

OTHER SUPPORTING PUBLISHERS	

	Anthropological Linguistics
		http://www.indiana.edu/~anthling/ 

	CSLI Publications
		http://cslipublications.stanford.edu/ 

	Graduate Linguistic Students' Assoc.   Umass
		http://glsa.hypermart.net/ 

	International Pragmatics Assoc.
		http://ipra-www.uia.ac.be/ipra/ 

	Kingston Press Ltd
		http://www.kingstonpress.com/ 

	Linguistic Assoc. of Finland
		http://www.ling.helsinki.fi/sky/ 

	MIT Working Papers in Linguistics
		http://web.mit.edu/mitwpl/ 

	Netherlands Graduate School of Linguistics / Landelijke
		http://www.lotpublications.nl/ 

	Pacific Linguistics
		http://pacling.anu.edu.au/ 

	SIL International
		http://www.ethnologue.com/bookstore.asp 

	St. Jerome Publishing Ltd.
		http://www.stjerome.co.uk 

	Utrecht institute of Linguistics
		http://www-uilots.let.uu.nl/ 
	



-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1217	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 14:58:58 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1218, Books: Applied Linguistics/Language Acquisition: Caldas

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1218. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1218, Books: Applied Linguistics/Language Acquisition: Caldas

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Maria Moreno-Rollins <maria@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

Links to the websites of all LINGUIST's supporting publishers
are available at the end of this issue. 


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Kathryn King < marketing@multilingual-matters.com >
Subject: Raising Bilingual-Biliterate Children in Monolingual Cultures:
Caldas 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 14:57:02
From: Kathryn King < marketing@multilingual-matters.com >
Subject: Raising Bilingual-Biliterate Children in Monolingual Cultures: Caldas 
 



Title: Raising Bilingual-Biliterate Children in Monolingual Cultures 
Series Title: Bilingual education & Bilingualism  

Publication Year: 2006 
Publisher: Multilingual Matters
	   http://www.multilingual-matters.com/
	

Book URL: http://www.multilingual-matters.com/multi/display.asp?isb=1853598755 


Author: Stephen J Caldas,   

Hardback: ISBN: 1853598763 Pages: 248 Price: U.S. $ 109.95
Hardback: ISBN: 1853598763 Pages: 248 Price: U.K. £ 54.95
Paperback: ISBN: 1853598755 Pages: 248 Price: U.K. £ 21.95
Paperback: ISBN: 1853598755 Pages: 248 Price: U.S. $ 39.95


Abstract:

This book is a longitudinal case study carefully detailing the
French/English bilingual and biliterate development of three children in
one family beginning with their births and ending in late adolescence. The
book focuses most specifically on the children's acquisition of French and
English during their early through late adolescence, in both their
Louisiana and Québec home environments. 



Linguistic Field(s): Applied Linguistics
                     Language Acquisition


Written In: English  (eng)
	
See this book announcement on our website: 
http://linguistlist.org/get-book.html?BookID=19175


MAJOR SUPPORTERS

	Blackwell Publishing          
		http://www.blackwellpublishing.com	

	Cambridge University Press          
		http://us.cambridge.org	

	Cascadilla Press          
		http://www.cascadilla.com/	

	Continuum International Publishing Group Ltd          
		http://www.continuumbooks.com	

	Edinburgh University Press          
		http://www.eup.ed.ac.uk/	

	European Language Resources Association          
		http://www.elda.org/sommaire.php	

	Georgetown University Press          
		http://www.press.georgetown.edu	

	Hodder Arnold          
		http://www.hoddereducation.co.uk	

	John Benjamins          
		http://www.benjamins.com/	

	Lawrence Erlbaum Associates          
		http://www.erlbaum.com/	

	Lincom GmbH          
		http://www.lincom.at	

	MIT Press          
		http://mitpress.mit.edu/	

	Mouton de Gruyter          
		http://www.mouton-publishers.com	

	Multilingual Matters          
		http://www.multilingual-matters.com/	

	Oxford University Press          
		http://www.oup.com/us	

	Palgrave Macmillan          
		http://www.palgrave.com	

	Rodopi          
		http://www.rodopi.nl/	

	Routledge (Taylor and Francis)          
		http://www.routledge.com/	

	Springer          
		http://www.springer.com	

OTHER SUPPORTING PUBLISHERS	

	Anthropological Linguistics
		http://www.indiana.edu/~anthling/ 

	CSLI Publications
		http://cslipublications.stanford.edu/ 

	Graduate Linguistic Students' Assoc.   Umass
		http://glsa.hypermart.net/ 

	International Pragmatics Assoc.
		http://ipra-www.uia.ac.be/ipra/ 

	Kingston Press Ltd
		http://www.kingstonpress.com/ 

	Linguistic Assoc. of Finland
		http://www.ling.helsinki.fi/sky/ 

	MIT Working Papers in Linguistics
		http://web.mit.edu/mitwpl/ 

	Netherlands Graduate School of Linguistics / Landelijke
		http://www.lotpublications.nl/ 

	Pacific Linguistics
		http://pacling.anu.edu.au/ 

	SIL International
		http://www.ethnologue.com/bookstore.asp 

	St. Jerome Publishing Ltd.
		http://www.stjerome.co.uk 

	Utrecht institute of Linguistics
		http://www-uilots.let.uu.nl/ 
	



-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1218	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 15:01:13 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1219, Books: Sociolinguistics: Dornyei, Csizer, Nemeth (Eds)

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1219. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1219, Books: Sociolinguistics: Dornyei, Csizer, Nemeth (Eds)

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Maria Moreno-Rollins <maria@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

Links to the websites of all LINGUIST's supporting publishers
are available at the end of this issue. 


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Kathryn King < marketing@multilingual-matters.com >
Subject: Motivation, Language Attitudes and Globalisation: Dornyei,
Csizer, Nemeth (Eds) 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 14:59:45
From: Kathryn King < marketing@multilingual-matters.com >
Subject: Motivation, Language Attitudes and Globalisation: Dornyei, Csizer, Nemeth (Eds) 
 



Title: Motivation, Language Attitudes and Globalisation 
Subtitle: A Hungarian Perspective 
Series Title: Second Language Acquisition  

Publication Year: 2006 
Publisher: Multilingual Matters
	   http://www.multilingual-matters.com/
	

Book URL: http://www.multilingual-matters.com/multi/display.asp?isb=1853598852 


Editor: Zoltan Dornyei, University of Nottingham
Editor: Kata Csizer, Eotvos University, Budapest
Editor: Nora Nemeth, Eotvos University, Budapest

Hardback: ISBN: 1853598860 Pages: 224 Price: U.S. $ 109.95
Hardback: ISBN: 1853598860 Pages: 224 Price: U.K. £ 54.95
Paperback: ISBN: 1853598852 Pages: 224 Price: U.K. £ 21.95
Paperback: ISBN: 1853598852 Pages: 224 Price: U.S. $ 39.95


Abstract:

This volume presents the results of the largest ever language
attitude/motivation survey, involving over 13,000 teenage language learners
in Hungary on three successive occasions: in 1993, 1999 and 2004. The
results are not confined to the European environment but have wider
implications concerning attitude change, motivational dynamics and language
globalisation. 



Linguistic Field(s): Sociolinguistics


Written In: English  (eng)
	
See this book announcement on our website: 
http://linguistlist.org/get-book.html?BookID=19177


MAJOR SUPPORTERS

	Blackwell Publishing          
		http://www.blackwellpublishing.com	

	Cambridge University Press          
		http://us.cambridge.org	

	Cascadilla Press          
		http://www.cascadilla.com/	

	Continuum International Publishing Group Ltd          
		http://www.continuumbooks.com	

	Edinburgh University Press          
		http://www.eup.ed.ac.uk/	

	European Language Resources Association          
		http://www.elda.org/sommaire.php	

	Georgetown University Press          
		http://www.press.georgetown.edu	

	Hodder Arnold          
		http://www.hoddereducation.co.uk	

	John Benjamins          
		http://www.benjamins.com/	

	Lawrence Erlbaum Associates          
		http://www.erlbaum.com/	

	Lincom GmbH          
		http://www.lincom.at	

	MIT Press          
		http://mitpress.mit.edu/	

	Mouton de Gruyter          
		http://www.mouton-publishers.com	

	Multilingual Matters          
		http://www.multilingual-matters.com/	

	Oxford University Press          
		http://www.oup.com/us	

	Palgrave Macmillan          
		http://www.palgrave.com	

	Rodopi          
		http://www.rodopi.nl/	

	Routledge (Taylor and Francis)          
		http://www.routledge.com/	

	Springer          
		http://www.springer.com	

OTHER SUPPORTING PUBLISHERS	

	Anthropological Linguistics
		http://www.indiana.edu/~anthling/ 

	CSLI Publications
		http://cslipublications.stanford.edu/ 

	Graduate Linguistic Students' Assoc.   Umass
		http://glsa.hypermart.net/ 

	International Pragmatics Assoc.
		http://ipra-www.uia.ac.be/ipra/ 

	Kingston Press Ltd
		http://www.kingstonpress.com/ 

	Linguistic Assoc. of Finland
		http://www.ling.helsinki.fi/sky/ 

	MIT Working Papers in Linguistics
		http://web.mit.edu/mitwpl/ 

	Netherlands Graduate School of Linguistics / Landelijke
		http://www.lotpublications.nl/ 

	Pacific Linguistics
		http://pacling.anu.edu.au/ 

	SIL International
		http://www.ethnologue.com/bookstore.asp 

	St. Jerome Publishing Ltd.
		http://www.stjerome.co.uk 

	Utrecht institute of Linguistics
		http://www-uilots.let.uu.nl/ 
	



-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1219	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:27:23 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1220, Calls: Phonology/Greece;Applied Ling/Netherlands

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1220. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1220, Calls: Phonology/Greece;Applied Ling/Netherlands

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Kevin Burrows <kevin@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

As a matter of policy, LINGUIST discourages the use of abbreviations
or acronyms in conference announcements unless they are explained in
the text.

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at 
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html. 



===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Anthi Revithiadou < revithiadou@rhodes.aegean.gr >
Subject: Old World Conference in Phonology 4 

2)
Date: 19-Apr-2006
From: Marjolein Deunk < m.i.deunk@rug.nl >
Subject: Applied Linguistics - A New Generation 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:24:51
From: Anthi Revithiadou < revithiadou@rhodes.aegean.gr >
Subject: Old World Conference in Phonology 4 
 

Full Title: Old World Conference in Phonology 4 
Short Title: OCP4 

Date: 18-Jan-2007 - 21-Jan-2007
Location: Rhodes, Greece 
Contact Person: Anthi Revithiadou
Meeting Email: ocp4@rhodes.aegean.gr
Web Site: http://www.ms.aegean.gr/ocp4/ 

Linguistic Field(s): Phonetics; Phonology 

Call Deadline: 01-Sep-2006 

Meeting Description:

OCP4 welcomes papers and posters from any theoretical perspective, addressing
any topic in phonology. At the same time, we also invite papers for a
Preconference Workshop on "Harmony in the Languages of the Mediterranean" 

Keynote Speakers:	
- Outi Bat-El (Tel-Aviv University) 
- Junko Itô (University of California, Santa Cruz)
- Armin Mester (University of California, Santa Cruz)
- Moira Yip (University College London) 

Call for papers 
?CP4 (January 18-21, 2007) 
Rhodes Aquarium, Rhodes, Greece

Pre-conference Workshop: ''Harmony in the Languages of the Mediterranean''
January 18, 2007 

Main Conference: January 19-21, 2007

Organized by: University of the Aegean, Division of Linguistics, Department of
Mediterranean Studies & University of Crete, Section of Linguistics, Department
of Philology 

Invited Speakers:	
- Outi Bat-El (Tel-Aviv University) 
- Junko Itô (University of California, Santa Cruz)
- Armin Mester (University of California, Santa Cruz)
- Moira Yip (University College London)

OCP4 Main Conference: 
OCP4 welcomes abstracts for 30-minute presentations plus 10 minutes for
discussion. Abstracts are also invited for a poster session. Submissions are
limited to one singly authored and one jointly authored abstract per author or
two jointly authored abstracts. 

OCP4 Workshop: ''Harmony in the Languages of the Mediterranean'' 
We encourage papers addressing harmony processes attested in languages (once)
spoken in the Mediterranean region. Submissions are limited to one singly
authored and one jointly authored abstract per author or two jointly authored
abstracts.

- Deadline for abstract submission: September 1st 2006
- Notification of acceptance: October 15th 2006

Abstract requirements

Abstracts must be submitted electronically in PDF or doc format. 
Abstracts should be one A4 page long with a second page limited to examples and
references. Authors should adhere to the following formatting requirements:
- 1 inch margins on top, bottom, left and right
- in 12 pt Times New Roman (10 pt for references) 
- single line spacing 
- normal character spacing

The named version of the abstract should start with:
- The title of the abstract in boldface and centred
- The name(s) of the author(s) centred
- The affiliation(s) of the author(s) centred (Leave one line after the title
and after the affiliation.)
- The body of the abstract must be justified (left and right)

The anonymous abstract should start with:
- The title of the abstract in boldface and centred
- The body of the abstract must be justified (left and right)

The filename should be unique. You should use your first name's initial and your
last name to name your abstract. For example, John Smith's abstract should be named:
- named-jsmith.pdf
- anon-jsmith.pdf

The body of the message should include the following information: 
- Author's Name(s) and contact information
- Affiliation 
- Title of the abstract
- Postal address & e-mail address

Abstract submission
 
1. Create an email message to: ocp4@rhodes.aegean.gr, with the text 'OCP4
Abstract Submission' in the subject line. 2. Attach both the anonymous and the
named versions of your abstract as PDF or doc files to the message.
3. Fill in the required information in the body of the message.
4. Please do not forget to specify whether your abstract should be considered
for (a) the Main Conference as a talk or a poster or both, (b) the
Pre-conference Workshop.

If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to contact the Organizing
Committee at:
ocp4@rhodes.aegean.gr or
revithiadou@rhodes.aegean.gr

Conference website:
http://www.rhodes.aegean.gr/tms/ocp4/
http://www.ms.aegean.gr/ocp4/

Organizing Committee:
Anthi Revithiadou 
Ioanna Kappa 
Marina Tzakosta



	
-------------------------Message 2 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:24:58
From: Marjolein Deunk < m.i.deunk@rug.nl >
Subject: Applied Linguistics - A New Generation 

	

Full Title: Applied Linguistics - A New Generation 

Date: 24-Jan-2007 - 26-Jan-2007
Location: Groningen, Netherlands 
Contact Person: Marjolein Deunk
Meeting Email: juniorresearchmeeting@anela.nl
Web Site: http://www.anela.nl/juniorresearchmeeting 

Linguistic Field(s): Applied Linguistics 

Call Deadline: 01-Jul-2006 

Meeting Description:

Anéla and GAL are pleased to announce:

Applied Linguistics_a new generation
International Research Meeting for Junior Applied Linguists

January 24-26, 2007; University of Groningen, the Netherlands
www.anela.nl/juniorresearchmeeting 

CALL FOR PAPERS
For more than 10 years, Anéla, the Dutch affiliate of AILA, has been organizing
the so called 'junior days' to which beginning researchers, PhD students, and
graduate students are invited to present their work in an informal and
supportive setting. These meetings have been very successful over the years,
providing beginning researchers the opportunity to present their work on an
academic forum and to receive valuable feedback. 

Stimulated by suggestions from the AILA International Committee, Anéla and GAL,
the German affiliate, have now planned to organize a joint International
Research Meeting for Junior Applied Linguists, aiming at an international
exchange of ideas and a stimulation of contacts between European affiliates of
AILA. Interaction with and feedback from both junior and senior researchers is
highly emphasized.

We invite junior researchers to submit abstracts for thirty-minute oral
presentations and/or poster presentations describing original work addressing
topics from one of the following fields of applied linguistics:

-	Language development
-	Language in the community
-	Language in education
-	Language in professional settings

Possible topics range from first and second language acquisition, literacy
development and language disorders to language variation and linguistic
discrimination, multilingualism and intercultural communication and from
language conflict, language policy and language planning to language and
communication in politics and by audiovisual- and virtual means. 

Language choice for abstracts and presentations is free. Abstracts can be
submitted through the website: www.anela.nl/juniorresearchmeeting.
For further information on the conference, please visit the website or contact
the local organizers at the following address: juniorresearchmeeting@anela.nl

Program committee: 
Kees de Bot (Groningen)
Herman Cölfen (Essen)
Jan Engberg (Aarhus)
Carmen Spiegel (Essen)
Jan ten Thije (Utrecht)
Eija Ventola (Helsinki)

Local organizers:
Sible Andringa (Groningen)
Kees de Bot (Groningen)
Marjolein Deunk (Groningen)
Rasmus Steinkrauss (Groningen)

Important dates: 
Submission deadline: July 1, 2006
Notification of authors: end of August 2006
Registration deadline: January 1, 2007
Conference: January 24-26, 2007


 



-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1220	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:31:57 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1221, Calls: General Ling/Ireland;Socioling/Canada

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1221. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1221, Calls: General Ling/Ireland;Socioling/Canada

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Kevin Burrows <kevin@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

As a matter of policy, LINGUIST discourages the use of abbreviations
or acronyms in conference announcements unless they are explained in
the text.

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at 
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html. 



===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Peter Kuehnlein < p@uni-bielefeld.de >
Subject: Constraints in Discourse 2006 

2)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Shelley Tulloch < shelley.tulloch@smu.ca >
Subject: Atlantic Provinces Linguistic Association Conference/Colloque Annuel de l?association de Linguistique des Provinces Atlantiques 2006 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:30:50
From: Peter Kuehnlein < p@uni-bielefeld.de >
Subject: Constraints in Discourse 2006 
 


Full Title: Constraints in Discourse 2006 
Short Title: CID06 

Date: 07-Jul-2006 - 09-Jul-2006
Location: Maynooth, Ireland 
Contact Person: Peter Kuehnlein
Meeting Email: p@uni-bielefeld.de
Web Site: http://www.constraints-in-discourse.org/cid06 

Linguistic Field(s): General Linguistics 

Call Deadline: 01-May-2006 

Meeting Description:

The goal of this workshop is to provide a forum for presenting recent research on constraints in discourse. The target areas include the recognition of discourse structure as well as the interpretation and generation of discourse in a broad variety of domains. 

Workshop on Constraints in Discourse   
                              
http://www.constraints-in-discourse.org/cid06

This is the second in a series of workshops entitled ''Constraints in
Discourse''.

For a many years, the development of precise frameworks of discourse
interpretation has been hampered by the lack of a deeper understanding
of the dependencies between different discourse units. The past 15
years have seen a considerable advance in this field. A number of
strong constraints have been proposed that restrict the sequencing and
attaching of segments at various descriptive levels, as well as the
interpretation of their interrelations. Last year's workshop CID2005 in
Dortmund revealed a number of issues that still have to be clarified
and worked upon. Most relevant topics turned out to be:
- the necessity to have a look at intonation and discourse structure
  more closely;
- the question of formal properties of discourse structure (tree-like
  or graph-like etc.);
- the question of (psychological, social or linguistic) reality of
  constraints;
- the interface between utterance-level and discourse-level analysis;
- and the empirical foundation and availability of corpus
  annotation of constraints.

The goal of this series of workshops is to provide a forum for
presenting recent research on constraints in discourse. The target
areas include the recognition of discourse structure as well as the
interpretation and generation of discourse in a broad variety of
domains. The workshop offers a forum for researchers from diverse
formal approaches, including but not limited to:
- Rhetorical Structure Theory (RST)
- Segmented Discourse Representation Theory (SDRT)
- Tree Adjoining Grammars
- Head-driven Phrase Structure Grammar (HPSG)
- The QUD Modell
- Plan Based Reasoning
- Abductive Reasoning
- Gricean Pragmatics
- Speech Act Theory

We invite talks that further our theoretical understanding of
the role of constraints in discourse, as well as empirical studies
that shed light on their empirical validity. The conference is explicitly
intended for discussion and comparison of theoretical
accounts that lay the ground for applications. It is not intended as a
platform for system demonstrations. Specific topics might relate to
 - Anaphora Resolution
 - Co-reference
 - Dialogical vs. Monological Discourse
 - Questions and Answers
 - Lexicon and Discourse Relations
 - Cognitive Modeling
 - Underspecification and Nonmonotonic Inferences
etc.

The organisers are planning to publish a selection of the results of
the workshop either as a special issue of a journal or as a book.

Publication (and workshop) language is English

The workshop is endorsed by SIGdial, the Special Interest Group on
Discourse and Dialogue, and SIGsem, the Special Interest Group on
Semantics, of ACL.

Invited Speakers

Barbara Kaup, Technical University Berlin
Alex Lascarides, University of Edinburgh
Jerry Hobbs, University of Southern California
Candace Sidner, Mitsubishi Electric Research Labs

Paper Submission

Researchers interested in contributing a paper to the workshop are
invited to submit an abstract that spans not more than 3 pages in PDF or PS
(single column, 10pt font size, a4 paper, including a bibliography)
using the form at the workshop website
(http://www.constraints-in-discourse.org/cid06). Reviews will be done
blindly; the abstracts may accordingly not include explicit hints that
allow the identification of the authors (such as ''in paper (...) we
show that'').

Important Dates

Deadline for Submissions: 1 May, 2006
Notification of Acceptance: 1 June, 2006
Final Abstracts due: 22 June, 2006
Conference: 7-9 July, 2006

Program Committee

Anton Benz, University of Southern Denmark, Kolding
Markus Egg, Rijksuniversiteit. Groningen, Netherlands
John Harpur, National University of Ireland, Maynooth
Jerry Hobbs, University of Southern California
Peter Kuehnlein, University of Bielefeld, Germany
Alex Lascarides, University of Edinburgh, UK
Barbara Kaup, Technical University Berlin, Germany
Gisela Redeker, Rijksuniversiteit, Groningen, Netherlands
Ivan Sag, Stanford University, USA
Candace Sidner, Mitsubishi Electric Research Labs, USA

Organisation

Organisation Committee:
Candace Sidner, Mitsubishi Electric Research Labs, USA (Chair)
Anton Benz, University of Southern Denmark, Kolding
John Harpur, National University of Ireland, Maynooth
Peter Kuehnlein, University of Bielefeld, Germany

Local Organisation:
John Harpur, National University of Ireland, Maynooth

Coordinates

The workshop will take place from 7-9 July, 2006. It will be hosted by
the National University of Ireland, Maynooth (NUIM). Maynooth is
situated 15 miles from Dublin in the heart of the Kildare countryside,
and is well served by motorway, rail and bus links. County Kildare is
on Dublin's doorstep and is in close proximity to Dublin Airport and
Seaport as well as Dun Laoghaire Harbour. It is also only a couple of
hours drive from most parts of Ireland.

Fees

Fees (including coffee breaks and lunch) are

Participants from Academia:      EUR 100
Participants from commercial enterprises: EUR 200


	
-------------------------Message 2 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:30:55
From: Shelley Tulloch < shelley.tulloch@smu.ca >
Subject: Atlantic Provinces Linguistic Association Conference/Colloque Annuel de l?association de Linguistique des Provinces Atlantiques 2006 

	

Full Title: Atlantic Provinces Linguistic Association Conference/Colloque annuel de l?association de linguistique des provinces atlantiques 2006 
Short Title: APLA/ALPA 2006 

Date: 03-Nov-2006 - 04-Nov-2006
Location: Halifax, Nova Scotia, Canada 
Contact Person: Elissa Asp
Meeting Email: elissa.asp@smu.ca
Web Site: http:// 

Linguistic Field(s): Anthropological Linguistics; General Linguistics; Sociolinguistics 

Call Deadline: 08-Sep-2006 

Meeting Description:

[francais suivra]

The Atlantic Provinces Linguistic Association Conference 2006 will focus on the characteristic ways that language is used in particular communities as well as aspects of linguistic communities in contact. Papers on other linguistic themes are also welcome.

Le Colloque annuel de l'association de linguistique des provinces atlantiques 2006 portera sur des usages caractéristiques de la langue au sein des communautés linguistiques, aussi bien que sur les différents aspects du contact entre ces communautés. Nous acceptons également les propositions de communication sur d'autres sujets linguistiques. 

[français suivra]

CALL FOR PAPERS
Atlantic Provinces Linguistic Association Conference
Saint Mary's University
Halifax, Nova Scotia, Canada
November 3 & 4, 2006

Conference Theme: Linguistic Communities

Community is the framework within which languages, and specific ways of using them, are acquired, developed, and practiced. Speakers often value and use social and regional varieties or minority languages as a way of acting out solidarity and belonging. Contact between linguistic communities can lead to changes in speech varieties and the contexts in which they are used. 
 
Papers are invited that look at the characteristic ways that language is used in particular communities as well as papers that examine aspects of linguistic communities in contact:
-	How is communication achieved within and across community boundaries? 
-	How does contact between communities influence in-group communication? 
-	How does use of language create and maintain group boundaries?
-	How does bilingualism/bidialectalism allow individuals to cross boundaries? 
-	What are the characteristics and functions of varieties in bilingual speech communities? 
-	Which factors contribute to the spread or decline of certain speech communities?

Keynote Speaker: Jean Briggs, Memorial University, Newfoundland
''Language Dead or Alive: What's in a Dictionary?''

We welcome proposals, in English or French, for papers relating to the conference theme and/or any other topic in linguistics. Graduate students are especially encouraged to submit. Papers are of 30 minutes duration (allow 20 minutes for presentation and 10 for discussion).

Abstracts should be no more than 300 words in length, excluding title and references. In a separate section, please list your paper title, name, affiliation (indicate if you are a student), your current
mailing and electronic address, your phone and fax numbers, and any audiovisual equipment that will be needed for your presentation. Please submit abstracts via email as separate attachments (MSWord, WordPerfect or Rich Text Format).

All presenters must be members of the Association. The annual membership fee of $25 ($10 for students) may be paid at the conference. The registration fee for the conference is $50 ($15 for students). 

Please send this information by e-mail to:
Elissa Asp,  Associate Professor of Linguistics and English, Saint Mary's University
elissa.asp@smu.ca
Phone (902) 420-5717	Fax (902) 420-5110

DEADLINE FOR SUBMISSIONS:	SEPTEMBER 8, 2006
 
APPEL À COMMUNICATIONS
Colloque annuel de l'association de linguistique des provinces atlantiques
Saint Mary's University
Halifax, Nouvelle-Ecosse, Canada
les 3 et 4 novembre 2006

Thème du colloque : Les communautés linguistiques

La communauté est le cadre dans lequel se développe, s'acquiert et se pratique une langue et ses usages.  Les personnes qui parlent une variété régionale ou sociale, ou une langue minoritaire, sont souvent très attachées à celle-ci, qu'elles utilisent aux fins de démontrer leur solidarité et leur appartenance.  Les contacts entre communautés linguistiques peuvent mener à des changements dans les variétés de langue et dans les contextes dans lesquels celles-ci s'utilisent.

Nous invitons les communications portant sur les usages caractéristiques de la langue au sein des communautés linguistiques, aussi bien que sur les différents aspects du contact entre ces communautés :
-	Comment s'effectue la communication, à la fois à l'intérieur des frontières communautaires et au travers de celles-ci ?
-	Comment le contact entre communautés influence-t-il la communication à l'intérieur du groupe ?
-	Quel est le rôle de l'usage linguistique dans la création et le maintien des frontières entre groupes ?
-	Comment le bilinguisme ou le bidialectalisme permet-il aux individus de franchir ces frontières ?
-	Quelles sont les caractéristiques et les fonctions des variétés en usage dans les communautés bilingues ?
-	Quels sont les facteurs qui contribuent à l'expansion ou au déclin de certaines communautés linguistiques ?

Conférencière invitée: Jean Briggs, Memorial University, Newfoundland
 'La langue, morte ou vive :  Que trouve-t-on dans un dictionnaire ?'

Nous acceptons les propositions de communication, en français ou en anglais, sur le thème du colloque mais aussi sur d'autres sujets linguistiques.  Nous encourageons tout spécialement les étudiants gradués à soumettre leurs propositions.  Les communications seront d'une durée maximum de 30 minutes (20 minutes de présentation et 10 minutes de discussion).  

Les résumés ne doivent pas dépasser 300 mots, sans compter le titre et les références.  Sur feuillet séparé, veuillez indiquer le titre de votre communication, vos nom et affiliation (mentionnez si vous êtes étudiant(e)), vos adresses courrier et courriel, et vos numéros de téléphone et de télécopie, ainsi que le matériel audio-visuel dont vous aurez besoin.  Veuillez soumettre votre résumé par courriel, comme pièce jointe (MS Word, WordPerfect ou RTF).

Toutes les personnes présentant des communications doivent être membres de l'Association.  La cotisation annuelle est de 25$ (CAN) (10$ pour les étudiant(e)s) et peut être payée sur place.  Les frais d'inscription au colloque seront de 50$ (15$ pour les étudiant(e)s).

Veuillez transmettre tous ces renseignements par courriel à : Elissa Asp,  Professeure associée de linguistique et d'anglais, Saint Mary's University   elissa.asp@smu.ca		
Téléphone (902) 420-5717		Télécopie (902) 420-5110

DATE LIMITE POUR ENVOYER LES PROPOSITIONS :  LE 8 SEPTEMBRE 2006
 



-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1221	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:34:59 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1222, Calls: Athapaskan Ling/Northwest Territory, Canada

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1222. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1222, Calls: Athapaskan Ling/Northwest Territory, Canada

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Kevin Burrows <kevin@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

As a matter of policy, LINGUIST discourages the use of abbreviations
or acronyms in conference announcements unless they are explained in
the text.

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at 
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html. 



===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 21-Apr-2006
From: Gary Holton < gary.holton@uaf.edu >
Subject: Dene (Athabaskan) Languages Conference 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:33:39
From: Gary Holton < gary.holton@uaf.edu >
Subject: Dene (Athabaskan) Languages Conference 
 


Full Title: Dene (Athabaskan) Languages Conference 

Date: 13-Jun-2006 - 15-Jun-2006
Location: Yellowknife, Northwest Territory, Canada 
Contact Person: Leslie Saxon
Meeting Email: saxon@uvic.ca
Web Site: http://www.uaf.edu/anlc/alc 

Linguistic Field(s): Not Applicable 

Language Family(ies): Athapaskan 

Call Deadline: 01-May-2006 

Meeting Description:

2006 Dene Languages Conference: 'Land and Language'

The Dene (Athabaskan) Languages Conference brings together linguists, speakers, educators and policy makers from across the Dene/Athabaskan region. Over the past two decades this conference has become the principal forum in which members of geographically distant, but culturally and intellectually related, Athabascan communities can compare notes and learn from each other. 

Second Call for Papers
Dene (Athabaskan) Languages Conference

The Organizing Committee is now requesting proposals for presentations at the 2006 conference. We are looking for presentations on any topic relating to Dene (Athabaskan) languages, including language teaching and learning, language documentation, language and culture, community programs, linguistics, language revitalization, and curriculum development.

Presenters will be assigned 30 minutes or 60 minutes for their talks. Please prepare presentations of 20 minutes or 45 minutes, plus 10 or 15 minutes for discussion. If you would like a longer presentation time, please contact the Program Coordinator.

The theme for the conference will be Land and Language. Proposals that speak to this theme are encouraged, but we do not want to limit proposals to this theme only.

Send proposals to Leslie Saxon, Program Coordinator. The deadline for proposals is Monday May 1, 2006. Proposals by e-mail (.doc, .rtf, or .pdf format only), fax, or mail are encouraged. Please use .pdf format if your text includes special fonts.

Leslie Saxon
Program Coordinator

saxon@uvic.ca

Department of Linguistics
University of Victoria
Victoria, BC Canada V8W 3P4
tel. 250-721-7422
fax. 250-721-7423




-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1222	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:41:18 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1223, Confs: General Ling/Amsterdam, Netherlands

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1223. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1223, Confs: General Ling/Amsterdam, Netherlands

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Kevin Burrows <kevin@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 19-Apr-2006
From: BUCLD 31 < langconf@bu.edu >
Subject: Amsterdam Gender Colloquium ? an International Workshop on Grammatical Gender 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:35:53
From: BUCLD 31 < langconf@bu.edu >
Subject: Amsterdam Gender Colloquium ? an International Workshop on Grammatical Gender 
 



Amsterdam Gender Colloquium ? an International Workshop on Grammatical Gender 

Date: 15-Sep-2006 - 16-Sep-2006 
Location: Vrije Universiteit Amsterdam, Netherlands 
Contact: Jenny Audring 
Contact Email: j.audring@let.vu.nl 

Linguistic Field(s): General Linguistics 

Meeting Description: 

Despite many years of research, grammatical gender still is 'one of the most interesting and difficult of the grammatical categories' (as Corbett says in a recent publication). This two-day workshop is intended for linguists who share the interest and appreciate the difficulties in the phenomenon of grammatical gender. 

CALL FOR PAPERS 
-DEADLINE EXTENSION-
May 15th, 2006

THE 31st ANNUAL BOSTON UNIVERSITY CONFERENCE ON LANGUAGE DEVELOPMENT
NOVEMBER 3-5, 2006

Keynote Speakers:
Roberta Golinkoff, University of Delaware
Kathy Hirsh-Pasek, Temple University
''Breaking the Language Barrier: The View from the Radical Middle''

Plenary Speaker:
Jurgen M. Meisel, University of Hamburg & University of Calgary
''Multiple First Language Acquisition: A Case for Autonomous Syntactic Development in the Simultaneous Acquisition of More Than One Language''

Lunch Symposium:
''Future Directions in Search of Genes that Influence Language: Phenotypes, Molecules, Brains, and Growth''
Mabel Rice, University of Kansas
Helen Tager-Flusberg, Boston University
Simon Fisher, University of Oxford
Discussant: Gary Marcus, New York University

All topics in the fields of first and second language acquisition from all theoretical perspectives will be fully considered.

All submissions must be received by 8:00 PM EST, May 15, 2006.

For further information regarding the conference, please visit the BUCLD website:
http://www.bu.edu/linguistics/APPLIED/BUCLD/

BUCLD is partially funded by grants from the National Science Foundation (BCS- 0130353) and the National Institutes for Health (R13 HD042130).

Boston University Conference on Language Development
96 Cummington Street, Room 244
Boston, MA 02215
U.S.A.
Telephone: (617) 353-3085
e-mail: langconf@bu.edu





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1223	

	

------------------------------

Date:    Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:45:52 -0400
From:    linguist@LINGUISTLIST.ORG
Subject: 17.1224, Confs: General Ling/Oslo, Norway

LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1224. Sat Apr 22 2006. ISSN: 1068 - 4875.

Subject: 17.1224, Confs: General Ling/Oslo, Norway

Moderators: Anthony Aristar, Wayne State U <aristar@linguistlist.org>
            Helen Aristar-Dry, Eastern Michigan U <hdry@linguistlist.org>
 
Reviews (reviews@linguistlist.org) 
        Sheila Dooley, U of Arizona  
        Terry Langendoen, U of Arizona  

Homepage: http://linguistlist.org/

The LINGUIST List is funded by Eastern Michigan University, Wayne
State University, and donations from subscribers and publishers.

Editor for this issue: Kevin Burrows <kevin@linguistlist.org>
================================================================  

To post to LINGUIST, use our convenient web form at
http://linguistlist.org/LL/posttolinguist.html.


===========================Directory==============================  

1)
Date: 20-Apr-2006
From: Maria Filiouchkina Krave < m.f.krave@ilos.uio.no >
Subject: Explicit and Implicit Information in Text - Information Structure Across Languages 

	
-------------------------Message 1 ---------------------------------- 
Date: Sat, 22 Apr 2006 18:44:27
From: Maria Filiouchkina Krave < m.f.krave@ilos.uio.no >
Subject: Explicit and Implicit Information in Text - Information Structure Across Languages 
 



Explicit and Implicit Information in Text - Information Structure Across Languages 

Date: 08-Jun-2006 - 10-Jun-2006 
Location: Oslo, Norway 
Contact: Maria Filiouchkina Krave 
Contact Email: m.f.krave@ilos.uio.no 
Meeting URL: http://www.hf.uio.no/forskningsprosjekter/sprik/english/activities/index.html#CfP 

Linguistic Field(s): General Linguistics 

Meeting Description: 

Explicit and implicit information in text. Information structure across languages.

Conference to be arranged by the project SPRIK Språk i kontrast/Languages in Contrast at the University of Oslo, Norway,  June 8-10, 2006.

The goal of the conference is to present and discuss current research in text interpretation, particularly textual cohesion and coherence across languages. We aim to bring together researchers interested in systematizing and explaining the variety of means exploited across languages to create cohesion and establish dependencies and discourse hierarchies in text. Different languages exploit similar means differently, partly due to competing structures available in the individual languages, partly due to language-typological differences. We are interested in empirically based cross-linguistic studies that contribute to a better understanding of explicit and implicit information in 'real' discourse, as well as in theoretical research modelling textual cohesion/coherence.

Conference Committee:

Prof. Cathrine Fabtricius-Hansen
Ass.Prof. Bergljot Behrens
Prof. Kjell Johan Så/bå¸
Prof. Stig Johansson 

We are happy to welcome you to the SPRIK Conference 2006:
Explicit and implicit information in text. Information structure across languages. June 8-10, 2006

Please, see the conference website for information on registration, accommodation and the detailed conference programme: http://www.hf.uio.no/forskningsprosjekter/sprik/english/activities/conf.html

Registration deadline: May, 25. To register, please fill in the electronic form available on the conference website.

Programme:

Thursday June, 8:

13.00-14.00 - Registration
14.00-14.10 - Cathrine Fabricius-Hansen (Univ. of Oslo): Opening
14.10-15.00 - Kjell Johan Sæbø (Univ. of Oslo): Free yourself from syntactic bondage: Adreflexive Intensification and the Theory of Focus and Information
15.00-15.40 - Shinji Ido (Tohoku Univ./ Univ. of Sydney): A model for sentence-fragment production: a preliminary study
15.40-16.10 - Gergely Pethõ,  Eva Kardos (Univ. of Edinburgh, Univ. of Debrecen): A cross-linguistic investigation of the licensing and interpretation of implicit object arguments
16.40-17.20 - Laia Mayol (Univ. of Pennsylvania), The discourse function of right-dislocation in Catalan
17.20-18.00 - Kerstin Kunz (Univ. of Saarbrücken): Investigating nominal coreference in originals and translations
18.00-18.40 - Silvia Hansen-Schirra, Stella Neumann, Erich Steiner (Univ. of Saarbrücken): Cohesion and explicitation in an English -German translation corpus

Friday June, 9:

9.00-9.50 - Robyn Carston (UCL): Balancing code and inference in linguistic communication 9.50-10.40 - Henning Nølke (Univ. of Aarhus): Connectors in a cross-linguistic perspective 11.10-11.50 - Jiun-Shiung Wu (National Chiayi Univ.): Aspectual Influence on Temporal Relations. A Case Study of the Experiential Guo in Mandarin
11.50-12.20 - Barbara Schmiedtová, Mary Carroll, Christiane v. Stutterheim, Natasha Sahonenko (Univ. of Heidelberg): Tense switch in Aspect/-Non-Aspect languages and its implications for information structure
12.20-13.00 - Anna Espunya (Pompeu Fabra Univ.): Making implicit information explicit: Kortmann's scale of informativeness and the English V-ing free adjuncts in Catalan tranlslations
14.00-14.50 - Regine Eckardt (Univ. of Göttingen): 'Eigentlich' - discourse functions and rhetoric effects (with Angelina Port, Berlin)
14.50-15.20 - Elena Karagjosova (Univ. of Oslo): On the concessive use of the German discourse marker 'doch'
15.20-15.50 - Nicholas Asher, Myriam Bras, Anne Le Draoulec (ERSS-CNRS, Toulouse): Evidence for a Scalar Analysis of Result in SDRT from a Study of the French Temporal Connective alors
16.20-16.50 - Ingrid Lossius Falkum (Univ. of Oslo): Contrastive Lexical Pragmatics:
A relevance-theoretic approach to lexical narrowing and broadening in English and Norwegian original texts and translations
16.50-17.20 - Nana Aba Appiah Amfo (NTNU, Trondheim): Explaining connectors in Akan discourse: the role of discourse markers
17.20-18.10 - Thorstein Fretheim (NTNU, Trondheim): The metarepresentational use of main clause phenomena in embedded clauses

Saturday June, 10:

9.00-9.50 - Henk Zeevat (Univ. of Amsterdam): Discourse Structure in Optimality Theoretic Pragmatics
9.50-10.30 - Patrícia Matos Amaral (Ohio State Univ. and Univ. of Coimbra): Entailment, assertion and textual coherence: a case study
10.50-11.30 - Maria Averintseva (Univ. Tübingen), Manfred Consten (Univ. Jena): The role of discourse topic and proximity for demonstratives in German and Russian
11.30-12.10 - Richard Zuber (CNRS, Paris): Some remarks on minimal sufficient conditions across languages
13.20-14.10 - Bonnie Webber (Univ. of Edinburgh): A Lexical Perspective on Discourse Structure and Semantics
14.10-15.30 - Closing discussion





-----------------------------------------------------------
LINGUIST List: Vol-17-1224	

	

------------------------------

End of LINGUIST Digest - 21 Apr 2006 to 22 Apr 2006 (#2006-103)
***************************************************************
